The same CIA report points out that there are more college-educated women than men in the DPRK, and admits that the Workers Party of Korea legitimately committed to ‘radical change’ in Korean gender relations. The facts support their conclusion: Prostitution is outlawed, women are permitted to serve in the military, state child-care programs allow women to have independent careers outside of the house and a significant number of high level political positions are occupied by women, including representation in the Supreme People’s Assembly.
Best moment this week? Telling everyone, including my family with a video. :)
Defending justice—was that such a joke?
He was using a nineteenth century all steel plow, and his faithful yet substantially rebellious mule, Teddy. After that last day of plowing, Ricky was putting away his plow by using a pulley system which lifted the plow into the loft of the barn. He only used this particular plow in the spring, and with all the plowing work done he wanted the plow stored out-of-the-way, so he would have plenty of room in his barn for his animals, seed, and fertilizer. While Ricky was ushering Teddy to pull, the mule decided he was ready to quit for the day. “Come on Teddy Pull!” Ricky said as he unleashed the whip at Teddy’s hips. Teddy didn’t budge. “I’m going to kill you. You’re one sorry mule, Teddy. YAW!” Ricky said as Teddy finally began to attempt to move. Slowly moving the plow upwards, Teddy again stopped and refused to move. “Teddy, we’re almost done. Get your ass in gear. What‘s your problem? Damn mule” Ricky had enough of the mule’s stubborn behavior, and he walked into the barn to get Bruno.
Her mind with age now dim—
Some random notes about the zine:
Last Friday I blogged about some of the reasons why arts organizations succeed and some reasons why they are failing. I hinted at the big elephant in the room, but for this Monday Moment, I will come out and declare it!
“What just happened here? I try to get Linden back to something like a normal life, thinking maybe his friends would be glad to see him, and you chase him off.”
And this is where the question of authority comes in. My guess is that Mr Gowlland, whose ministry is now in temporarily in abeyance (the diocese are denying he has been suspended, which is true insofar as he is allowed to go anywhere but that church), was regarded by some in the congregation as lacking the authority to do what he did.
And so powerful, and strengthening and motivating.
Till its too late.
In Quatro, "commanders" didn't beat prisoners, they "corrected" them; this was the way the propaganda went. A prisoner received a "corrective measure".
Rob Mimpriss is a writer of short fiction from north Wales. He was one of the prize winners in the most recent Rhys Davies Short Story Competition.
In a small pan, warm the milk, butter and orange zest until the butter melts, then set aside to infuse. (50 degree C)
"Move it... lazy girl" he said giving me a hard smack on my behind and a cause to start a pretend fight.
This month I felt like everything was new...so different to card making and working with inks and stamps.
I don’t think vaporized petro-chemicals OR vaporized depleted uranium are good things to get on your skin or ingest. So I put out this warning to pay attention to the radiation monitors and to minimize your exposure to the precipitation that is produced off this storm.
We celebrated the knowledge of what he was struggling with, we celebrated progress however small, we enjoyed him, and let him guide us that day. Unfortunately, the weather sucked, so our original plan for the zoo (and for letting him lead us around on foot at his own pace) was not an option. We decided to hit the aquarium. Interestingly, this is what we did for his birthday weekend last year, but I'm happy to say that this year he had so much more fun.
3. Christopher Plummer, Beginners – I know it’s a cliché at this point: “if you want an Oscar, go gay.” Well, that’s probably going to work out for Christopher Plummer, and deservedly so. Plummer plays a man who has spent decades upon decades in the closet and is finally living openly in the twilight of his life. He knows time is short and he may not find that one true love, but he can be himself and in that he can find happiness.
“Love is composed of a single soul inhabiting two bodies.” (Aristotle)
'They were screaming,' (aka egging on the RIOTERS) They say that they would not have got together if it was not for the incident. SNIP
The title could lead you to think, “You’re stuck in a job you hate and can’t get out?”
That’s the sign of a great book.
The deal is big for regatta organizers, who hope to showcase the modernized America’s Cup racing to mainstream fans. Racing will be on a short course close to shore rather than miles out to sea, and in fast, wing-sail catamarans rather than plodding sloops.
Arthur was sitting in the living room on an oriental rag (a must for a posh cat) and when I approached he growled like a dog and very loud. He made it very clear : don't approach one step more ! I cleaned the floor and went to bed again. Next morning I found a chicken bone in the living room, which he had stolen out of the bin. What a night !
other talented ladies. Her smooth, husky voice voice sends chills down my spine.
I started taking daily shots of growth hormone when I was 13, a few months after I was diagnosed, and only stopped when I was 17. I then began hormone replacement therapy (or just “HRT”) with estrogen to make me go through puberty, which couldn’t happen before, according to the physicians, as it would compromise my growth. I won’t talk about what it was like to experience many things other teenage girls had been through years after them. I’ll just say it wasn’t fun.
NASA is normally super-cautious, not only to schedule reentry on a trajectory over ocean (south Pacific or Atlantic) – to avoid potential conflict with commercial air traffic or the complication of an accident over such an important landmass – but also does not issue a specific schedule beforehand – for ‘security reasons’.
That which doesn’t kill us makes us stronger, but that which can kill us makes us reclusive, as crippled by our own fears and doubts and insecurities and guilt as by the physical limitations of a body that, after years of hedonism and neglect, is taking out its revenge on Benjamin Lethbridge.
That small amount of selfless sacrifice carried me through the routine until it came time to blow-dry my hair. I stood in front of the mirror, trying as hard as humanly possible not to wonder if the acid slime monster was going to drop from the ceiling onto my head. My mind is the sort that dwells on things, you see. It’s not enough for me to frighten myself by reading about demons and ghosts and acid slime monsters. No, my mind constantly returns to their horrific existence, and most frequently it does this when I’m alone. (You want to know the real reason I still live at home? There it is. I am afraid to be alone.) The slime monster in Phantoms had devoured its victims by spraying them with corrosive acid. My imagination drifted again as I thought about the phrase “corrosive acid.” I pictured myself caught unawares, face contorted in terror as a slimy oozy terrifying THING descended upon me. Would it eat my hands first, to prevent me scraping it off, I wondered. Or would it immediately dissolve my face, burning me horribly and destroying my gorgeousness? Maybe it would slither around my ankles and then slurp its way up onto my torso. Or what if it jumped out from behind the-
I think we need to cool down as lightworkers and reject acting as a herd or mob. In my view, we need to wean ourselves from the self-righteousness that was so evident in us when we were fighting the cabal.
After that, Mama Cat said that she had done enough practicing for one day. She thanked Me for providing the bird handler and trotted back toward her yard. Domino, Thomas, The Brothers and I watched her go in respectful silence. None of us could believe what we had seen, and all of us were very aware of the fact that the stakes had just been raised for this year’s Catlympic Games.
To give a perspective on how far ahead Audi won the race, the 2nd-place Audi R18 driven by Timo Bernhard, Romain Dumas and Loic Duval was four laps off the 325-lap pace set by the winners in the season opener for both the American Le Mans Series and the new FIA World Endurance Championship.
Usually grammars come high up in the academic league tables, with most scoring close to 100% in the government’s chosen measure- pupils getting five A* to C grades including maths and English.
Their words tumbled out hurriedly, they tripped awkwardly around them.....
Here are a few snippets, with the link to the full Antillean article at the end…
We were invited over for a lovely sit-down steak dinner at our friends' awhile back, and I took the opportunity to try a recipe for steakhouse-style dinner rolls as an accompaniment for the meal.
A cute book about a robot who makes toast and plays the polka. The pictures are both futuristic and retro at the same time and the story is a good with a good lesson.
In its first few months, some ghosts appeared, but the most interesting supernatural plot twist involved a character who was a “phoenix” (Diana Millay) and wanted to bring her son (the boy being cared for by the governess) to immortal life. “Laura the Phoenix” was a pretty odd creation for a daytime soap, but was topped in March ’67 by the opening of a coffin that let loose vampire Barnabas Collins (Jonathan Frid).
things are going to change around here.
If I still had a 14 or 15 year old son. I would so much rather he read a book which explores real violence and sex and it's consequences, emotionally and physically, than this.
is a smaller version of our Shabby Chic Labels Four QR code for you to play with if you have a smart phone!! Very cool huh?
Keep an eye out for the actual photos from the shoot featuring one of a kind Jeffrey Campbell designs. The shoes are tall, exciting and out of this world amazing!
To my surprise, I am not freaking out. At least not on the outside. I am pretty calm and content, with the exception of the my-heart-just-skipped-a-beat feeling every time we go upside down. Even when we went through the parts I was not initially a fan of, I was okay. I did not fall out of the seat like gravity would predict when I went upside down. I just held onto the little strap and went with it. Then, it was over. We stopped, and I just looked around me. I was clearly shocked, maybe a little sad it was over so fast, but in the end I was happy I did it. Then, I woke up.
-- "Oh, don't worry," he says, unfazed. "Everyone cries in Argentina. You'll fit in well. We're very dramatic people."Diplomatic answer. Good man.
Yes, it is just three months and twenty three days late, did you forget about “better late than never.” Hope some of you are still continuing with your new year resolutions. DG didn’t make one, she gave up few years ago on resolutions because the pixels don’t match her drive just as the fish don’t ride the bikes. This post is not new it was penned few months ago when in a week three people told her they wanted a “life like yours” but did not make it here because other posts made it. So now why is it resurfacing? It is resurfacing because three more people within a week have wished for “a life like hers.”
Three weeks ago I had the same little problem I did this week, and was strapped for cash but really, really wanted cupcakes. So you know when you get all Martha Stewart and think you can whip up something out of nothing? That was me, times ten. I only had bread flour as usual, and figured there must be some darn red velvet recipe out there that calls for bread flour. Well there was one, but whoever wrote it needs to be shot. Okay not with a gun, but a horse tranquilizer would suffice. I mean really, bread flour for red velvet? What were they thinking! What was I thinking even trying it!? It was stiffer than a cutting board, more dense than a pound cake, and tasted like paper...better yet, a napkin. It was a total let down for myself, my confidence, and my poor best friend who had to do taste testing. Note: ALWAYS secretly taste test before having someone else do it. Save yourself the embarrassment. You're not that amazing yet.
O M G how did they find all this out when only about 30 years ago they know nothing about these writings but hold onto you hat it get even weirder.
Good morning fellow bloggers! This may be one of my last posts until the move. We have already gone through most of our stuff and purged whatever was not needed. Now I am starting to put things away in boxes. My house is starting to look strangely empty. :( But it is on to bigger and better things.(I hope) So, I wanted to make a last post with you. Who knows, I might make one one before we leave if I am able too. So, on to the good stuff.......
Pretty evenly matched. I think I tend to push myself more at home with the Xbox because no one can see me, plus it doesn’t really feel like exercise. And, the main one, if I’m a bit unco or lose my focus for a second, I’m not going to faceplant as I fall off the back of a treadmill… What I really need to do, is invest yet more money on a personal trainer or something to teach me how to run. I see my reflection in the window at the gym and I don’t look comfortable at all.
“The songs and dances are a way of bringing to that frame certain political concerns that couldn’t be talked about otherwise,” Joshi says.
I raise this issue, not because I think the doctrine of inerrancy is unimportant or even false, but simply because I know the reality of Christ’s resurrection is more important than an inerrant Bible. Furthermore, I don’t want anyone’s faith in Christ to be hindered or destroyed due to perceived errors in the Biblical text.[1] Our faith should be grounded in nothing less than the resurrected person of Jesus Christ. It is in Christ that the truth of Christianity stands or falls, and thus the focus of our Christian faith should be the resurrected Jesus, not the inerrancy of Scripture.
There happened to be a spouse of a neighbor there. I was explaining to him the story while showing the keys and ID. The ID showed the same university that the guy’s brother attended. He said he’d give the keys and ID to his bro, who would in turn hand her things over to the school. They would then contact her.
of the raging
Love arrives
the characters in this book are copyright Marvel Comics
Children — and others — take to bikes and scooters, because of the cooling effect of air movement. Calls for more summer school and even year-round school cease. Our kids don’t need more time inside, everyone agrees; they need the shady playgrounds and water sprinklers that spring up in every neighborhood.
Well, basically it is not something new, and you also can find actual true pictures of Israeli soldiers acting immoral, as well as you can of many other armies or militant groups. We can always find actual examples on people acting wrong or worse than mere wrong. But this picture in itself is an example of people acting this way, than rather than being honest, even in their dislike of Israel, chose to go that step further, and engaged in slander. We have to react against actions like this, as well as react against the soldier – had the picture been true – acting like this. But the problem here is that pictures always tell what the presenter wants them to tell. Always. The notion “a picture tells more than a thousand words” is true, but it should be expanded to “a picture tells more than the thousand words the sender wants to tell about a story, whether true or false.” We don’t know what really happened in context of any given picture, only what the person presenting it wants us to know about it, and maybe he/she wishes to give a certain story, which goes according to the “reality” he/she wants people to believe, then that is what the picture will tell. But that’s the actual pictures themselves, this is worse, this is not a true picture, this is a lie presented as truth, in order to give someone a bad name, in order to spread hatred. That can’t be excused, no matter what, and I simply have to react against it.
Sometimes it's really hard to bite your lip and be an adult when the three year old yells "I don't like you right now, Mommy!"
What are some situations that make you happy, or satisfied?
It takes absolutely nothing to make me laugh :)
We've got more growing to do
It's one last glance in the mirror and then out the door.
Did you think that cleaning out my Master Closet had killed me? Almost. But I am a LITTLE tougher than that. I have been doing so much, but not accomplishing enough. Know where I am coming from? I've been trying to get to my photo organization and the final day of the 21 day challenge posted (which has been done for a while...) so really it is just the photo organization that has been holding me up. I don't know why--maybe because Toni gave us until the end of the month? Procrastinator! Then I realized, Holy Cow, it's almost Groundhog Day and I am supposed to host my first linky party (I guess that's what it is called?)
Thank you, Brianna.
It was a really good day. I am so blessed to have the family that I do, and we love each other so much. Ian is generous with his praise about me as a wife and mother, and the children told me over and over how much they love me. Wonderful.
And here's a close-up shot of our little sitting area. We love our white slipcovered couch from IKEA, although it is in desperate need of a good washing. Hence, the throws draped over the cushions. It looks cozy and covers up a mulititude of sins. I also used some of Liam's Christmas stuffed animals as decor.
Outside the European Parliament in Brussels stands a section of the Berlin Wall, a testament to the reasons underlying the creation of the European Union. The broken Wall is proof that we are stakeholders in the largest post-conflict political project the world has seen. In the wake of a bitter and divisive conflict, a few individuals took steps to ensure that, as the Schuman Declaration reads, war became not merely unthinkable, but materially impossible. Robert Schuman was one of the pioneers of the European Project, and it was his hope that from the fusion of economic interests could grow a wider and deeper community between those who had long been in conflict- in essence, what we would all like to see in Northern Ireland. The passage of time has proved Schumann to be correct- in Europe, we are moving towards an ever closer Union. The concept of this myriad of European nations coming together would have been unimaginable in times past, and illustrates only the wide ocean of potential that lies before Northern Ireland.
PLEASE CLICK ON EACH PICTURE TO ENLARGE
As a finishing touch, I added canvas around the edge of all the letters (also an unoriginal idea). I started by cutting strips of natural canvas slightly larger than I needed, then using Stitch Witchery and a hot iron to bond and finish the edges.
I loved the whole experience from being feet away from the world’s top tennis athletes to meeting and talking shop with the other photographers working the event. Alas, this project was able to put a little bit of the “fun” back into photography for me.
“But who are you? I don’t know you!”
Online Passes
3. Are they lying?
Do you notice how the Mount of Olives is on one ridge
In this case I doubt the validity of the inclusion of Paraphilic Coercive Disorder as a diagnostic catergory.
Right now she throws a hissy fit when asked to eat something she does not want to eat, and she is direct in saying what she likes and doesn’t like. But pretty soon she will learn to eat what her parents and grandparents say she should eat, and pretty soon she will learn to hide the honesty and candor she had at two, three, four, and five years of age. Comes with the territory, I’m afraid.
As a race director I appreciate some of the cool things that make a race work. In order to make a point to point race work, a good RD has to get everyone to the starting line. Last year when I ran the Run for the Red, we all met at the finish line an hour before start time and a fleet of school buses took us to the start. All the buses in the Tri-State area are borrowed to get 45,000 of us to Staten Island for the Start of the NYC Marathon. The NJ Marathon people did something cooler. The had their own train. Yes, a brand new double decker (almost) express from Penn Station to Monmouth Race Track. Slick and Free.
I seem to be in the habit of taking big breaks from blogging and then saying, "Gee where did the time go?" Well, real life intervenes, doesn't it? There are sometimes when I feel all warm and gushy about what is happening in my life and I just want to shout from the mountain-tops how awesome it all is. And then, there are times when I am quietly grateful for the creature comforts and relative ease of my life: food, clothing, warm beautiful house in a lovely setting, healthy family, loving spouse.... those things that I would take for granted if I didn't make a habit of gratitude, something I am actively cultivating in 2012. A friend of mine is working on a gratitude project here: Random Acts of Gratitude and Generosity and it fits right in with my commitment to spend some time each day really feeling grateful, and talking about it with my kids. It is sometime easy to fall into a habit of complaint, or just disgruntlement.
The Religion from Hell, always in search of pushing the boundaries of absurdity and atrocity, has killed ninety young people in Iraq for wearing the Emo hairstyle. The students were stoned to death after some Imam claimed that the Emo styles were a form of devil-worshiping.
Phillip Kemp
Bottoms Up Make-Out Bandits.
I worked at Airleaf Publishing through 2006, (they closed in 2008) and I just want to help out if I can.
(4) Add carrots, beans, and squash to the soup. Simmer about 8-10 minutes to blend all the flavors together, adding more broth or water to thin the soup if necessary or preferred. Season with salt and pepper to taste, and discard the thyme sprigs and bay leaf.
Will you love me? Maybe forever?
‘mild renal impairment’ code by the most diligent of us, but kidneys, on
The other day my friend was complaining about how her mother didn’t want too many people jumping on her trampoline at once. This led to a discussion with a different friend about a certain Community episode where Troy and Jeff discovered a secret, zen garden with a giant trampoline and the single rule of no double-bounces.
I just love it when some tech or nurse comes up to me, oh, at 3:00 a.m. in the middle of a hellish shift and says "look at the bright side, you only have 4 more hours". This is the equivalent to saying to someone "look at the bright side, I am only going to stick you with this HOT POKER for four more hours". I don't think that person would say "great!, I thought you were going to poke me for 5 hours".
- You have to be home before midnight.
And speaking of passover, for those of you who are stumped on the sweets- we are loving smitten kitchen's round-up of 17 flourless recipes , genius.
And there was a third group of friends: the fellow broken hearts. They waited to talk to me, their tissues close and their tears spilling.
Both teams view the match as a critical part of their 2013 Rugby League World Cup preparations. The Tongans are in Group C with Scotland and Italy, while the USA are in Group D with Wales and the Cook Islands.
Today the clocks finally went forward and I dared to venture outside, where I put up the first outdoor REAL wall since getting here to Kingston. And what a wall it is!
Anyhow, that’s that. A place to start, I suppose.
There is reason to assume he is a tory, as, it turns out that the rich are unempathetic and selfish: the poorest 3rd donate more of their cash as a proportion of income than the richest third. It comes as no surprise to me. All this talk of Big Society smells to me of people who do not really participate in society, people who are pretty much excluded from society, by reason of wealth. They don't realise that the little people go around helping each other out and empathising with each other all the time. If your view of the world is filtered by the scaremongering prism of the Daily Mail, you might not realise that.
One time when I was 5 or 6 I had stayed home from school because I was sick. I remember him telling me that he was going across the street to get a newspaper…. and he didn’t come home. I called the police because I was scared, who in turn called my mother to come watch me. Come to find out, he was at the bar.
Jenro sighed. And his heart felt a lot burdened by all that he said. He knew he couldn’t keep up with himself. He knew he couldn’t keep up with the people’s expectations of him. It’s hard, and he just felt his heart filled with so much weight.
11.Which living person do you most despise?
You'll need a really soft and sweet dough for this, and the secret is milk and corn syrup.
I'm thankful for alot this season!!!!! One of the things I'm certainly thankful for is my faithful readers that drive by my spot on the world wide web. I appreciate you for taking time out of your schedule to support NuVision for a NuDay!!!!!!!
She wobbled out of her office to the entrance of the store. Pressing her legs together, she chewed her lip in agony as the slightest movement ricocheted spasms of pleasure through her body. Her eyes fixed on the gold-plated sign hanging on the inside of the glass door meters away from her. Her mission to
Kate xo
Christmas is tomorrow and I couldn't be happier. All four of my daughters, my brother and sister-in-law, two of Jen's kids, and her sister and mother will all be at my house for dinner tonight. Jen and I no doubt will be going nuts with all the company, yet, neither of us would have it any other way.
Two weeks went by, which did not bother me, since I knew the job was not due to start for a few weeks. After another week or so, I called to find out when the training was scheduled to begin. The girl who answered the phone said that the guy was not in the office, he was in rehearsal. When I asked if he was rehearsing with the stilt performers, she answered yes.
My friends know how much I love anything vintage be it from the flowery patterns of Cath Kidston’s bags to the black and white Audrey Hepburn printed trunks.
each with 1/2 teaspoon peanut butter. Top with
When people ask, I have two default positions,
She taught me Turn, and Counter-turn, and Stand;
7) Clothes or Naked? If we leave the house he is fully dressed with shoes. My husband is adamant about this. Culturally in Brazil, he feels that if we exit the house with stains on a shirt or no shoes people are going to look at us and think we aren’t taking good care of our son, or we are poor, or something. I don’t know how much of this is true, but my SIL and my MIL were equally adamant when we stayed in Ipatinga, so I am following the culture. At home he plays in his diaper a lot because it is very hot with no central a/c. Now in winter and no heater, he wears play outfits to keep warm on the tile floor. FYI carpet isn’t popular here and is considered “dirty.” We use floor rugs that are washable.
This commercial features the T-Mobile pink dress girl. I call her that because every commercial you see her in, she’s in a pink dress. Pink (magenta to be specific) being T-mobile’s signature color.
At the rear, tiny pearl buttons are visible.
Is just too hard for us
Arab leaders back UN peace plan at summit in Baghdad
3) Hollywood
But, my QTH is "notoriously" quiet. Just because I can receive something, does it follow that a vessel at sea, with a small Navetex antenna jammed somewhere about it's superstructure, will do so?
Make soap, in spring
O God! can I not grasp
This is a bad morning. There is a lot of joy in my life, and most of the time I am appreciative. Sometimes, though, sometimes you just have to be honest and let out even the darkest, most hideous truths.
Toontje Lager Stiekem gedanst NL
The characters are all quite cliche. You’ve got the main character, a sporty yet studious boy who has a need to get back home which drives him through the first half of the book, and a sense of honor which drives him through the second half. Then you’ve got the main supporting character, an extremely smart yet extremely athletic girl who can outsmart and outrun the MC at every turn, and who is a distinct feminist. In a world where men rule, that last point is important, and comes up in any story of this kind. Ferrin, as I’ve said, is deceitful and helpful, trademark Brandon Mull. The blind king was probably my favorite character, the way he lives a charade fabricated by his “subjects” and himself. Drake was a good character too, along with Jasher. I like the seed men a lot. Unfortunately, the ages of the main characters, Jason and Rachel, are in question. They’re said to be thirteen years old, but they seem to be 16 through the whole thing. I was wondering…
I had a different perspective on what a grandmother was then. I was a young child; everything was play. Swimming, running, digging in the dirt...they were all part of my days as a child.
Apple CEO Tim Cook recently announced that iCloud has already reached the 100 million user mark. With MobileMe users yet to make the switch, it is a safe bet that those numbers will continue to rise.
Monday evening a nurse from the Surgical Unit called to give me specifics for Tuesday’s surgery. I was told that I needed to be at the hospital by 7:00 a.m. to get some labs drawn. The drive took us about an hour and a half, so we left our house at 5:30. Kevin, and my sister Beth were with me that morning. My Dad and Step-Mom drove down separate and arrived at the hospital around 8:30.
May the Father bless you and visit you in your times of prayer.
Warmer sea temperatures are extending the oxygen-less “dead zones” in the world’s oceans, causing sea life to squeeze together in narrower corridors to avoid suffocation. Meanwhile, carbon dioxide in the atmosphere is acidifying the world’s oceans faster than at any time in the past 300 million years. And, again, there are still those who deny global warming. But there is also some good news, and I will turn to that.
I have shown two heroes of mine and giants of the Belle Epoque flanking Gustave Eiffel's magnificent structure on the banks of the Seine. À gauche we have author Alexandre Dumas père, with his most famous work, The Three Muskateers, beneath his arm. Like that other great raconteur, gourmand, bon vivant and essayist Peter Ustinov, Dumas had a black grandmother and his mad Larry King hair-do was part of that rich legacy. I have a great tome by Dumas père on Gastromony - a brilliant read.
I better drink caffeine tomorrow....all....day....long.
~ Flourishes Bring Back Beautiful "Beauty of a Technique Challenge" : Crackle Glaze Medium
30) Schloss Schauenstein (Fürstenau, Switzerland)
It will be interesting to hear what fake excuses RNC Chair Michael Steele will have to say about this latest mess. Where are all the black Republicans and conservatives when this stuff jumps off? It's always funny how they suddenly fall quiet. And as usual, our black liberal leadership will be outraged, but powerless. Post racial, my ass.
My next card is still girly, but not so pink!
I stared at her. "Me? I can't be dead. I can see myself right down there!"
As Gandhi said, “Be the change you wish to see in the world.”
In this variation we each have a pile of math tiles (or blocks, or differently colored coins) ready to put down on whichever squares we land on. The angle circle game I wrote about earlier is one variation of this. The goal can be to put an object down on every square where it doesn't matter whether or not your opponent has already put an object down on that square. Or you can play it where objects are stacked and the person whose marker is put on last controls that square, and the person controlling the most squares wins.
Instead of facing the fact that too many people are competing for resources, they while away their time, making transformation plans whilst blaming everything, from labour-brokers to white farmers, weather, apartheid, thieves-in-their-midst and wages, for the plight of the poor and desperate.
DOOMF!!
My Girl (K-drama)
Notes: Same as the French Market, nothing here but little salad cups, but there salad cups are here so it gets counted.
We flew in to San Francisco and then rented a van to drive the three hour trip to Carmel Valley. Upon our arrival in Carmel, we settled into a lovely property called Holman Ranch, where we were greeted by horses, wild flowers, and an idyllic view of Carmel Valley. We met up with Laurie Arons, the mastermind behind the event, who was overseeing the ranch-style rehearsal dinner (lassos and all) for the wedding guests. Laurie enlisted the help of Kathleen Deery for florals and design, and together they created one of the most beautiful events I've ever seen.
These are the real battles to be fought out over the next decade or so. The political parties need to start facing up to these issues. And so do we, the great British public.
What is a manger to do when confronted with market timers?
“Son of a bitch!” I yelled loud enough to draw the attention of all the good commuters over at the gas pumps. Feeling tired from working all night and utterly disgusted over the fact that something once offered free as a courtesy now cost twice money as I had on hand I almost decided to put on the spare tire and be done with it until I remembered my new KIA Rio does not come with one.
A great season starter, though it dragged a bit at the beginning of the second hour. I look forward to seeing what’s to come. I won’t be staying up til midnight again on a Sunday night (yea tivo). It has taken me 2 days (at the time of writing this) to recover. I wish I could say I had too many martinis, but alas, I had one very good, very dirty martini.
Happy days all-round. Heeeyyyyyyyyyyyy!!!
♦ nickel free
1 p ZUMBATOMIC by Sarah Folland
as winter slides in
G: The Slasher Era (Mid to late 80's)
When I think back to 2 weeks ago, we were in desperate need of encouragement. We had been working hard at the paperwork for 4 full months and felt as though or privacy had been thoroughly invaded. You couldn't convince us that there was no end in sight even though we were close to finishing the process. We also struggled with being positive when comparing our path to growing our family to others' paths.
Now we have not discussed the process in-depth of taking the photo after exposure from the Sensor to Storage. So in the next posts in this series, I plan to explore “The Data Transfer” and “What the camera sees of what I do.”
and i secretly hid the mothers day presents that i got for my mom and his mom
When soup is the desired consistency; whisk in sour cream and cheese. Remove bacon from skillet with a slotted spoon and add to soup and serve.
It was a family affair, to be sure.
What a crazy fun-filled week! We had so much fun on Valentine's Day! We made these cute Love Bug Valentine bags to put our Valentine cards in. They turned out super cute! My room mother came in and she had the kids make these cute heart shaped hats out of a paper plate! They turned out way cute! (Unfortunately, I forgot my camera so I had to use my phone! These shots came out a bit blurry!)
Hip enclave? Urban-style? Starbucks as an amenity? Wow, I don’t even have to write a punchline this is such comic gold.
With the gradual privatization of common land in the UK, which has become rife during the last part of the 20th century, the Gypsies have found increasingly fewer stopping places on their travels. They used to do a great deal of work as farm labourers, hop picking and suchlike, and farmers would welcome itinerant workers to stay on their land whilst their work was needed, knowing that they'd travel on after the work was done. But the spreading commercialization of farming and the burgeoning of "agribusiness" where traditional farming ways have been swallowed by the soulless money-hungry machine, has meant little more need for travelling farm workers and so the Gypsies had to find other ways of earning their living.
The publishing studies classroom has hosted several thought-provoking discussions over the course of the semester. The e-book has had its fair share of yays and nays, and submissions for “The Pick” literally got picked apart. The class is also putting together a newsletter, another medium that lends itself to heavy opinion. Now on its way to the layout and design phase, there’s no doubt that the newsletter will continue to be a hot topic on the agenda.
If this all sounds interesting and illuminating, considering committing to their Thursday night workshops. It's a great way to continue talking and thinking about these issues in Crown Heights.
USP: The storyline behind their first album, of selling up and living on a sailing boat for the best part of a year, informs their first album, while the novelty of that story caught the internet’s attention and brought them to semi-prominence online.
5. Once the beans are done enough (still crunchy) toss in the rest of the vegetables, bean sprouts, shrimp, and more curry, if you want. After a minute take the pot off the stove, the heat from the vegetables will continue to cook the shrimp and bean sprouts.
Did I like them as a human being? Hardly.
However, an opinion is really on worth something if it produces a useable solution and so focusing on what works in increasing voter turnout and increasing votes for a party is very much needed in this opinion swamped world. An experiment was conducted in 1998 as a large-scale voter-turnout experiment that attempted to stimulate turnout by means of a personal canvass of randomly selected households, using a variety of different nonpartisan appeals
I wouldn't be surprised to see 13-3 or 14-2. I would expect 12-4 at the very worst.
Green and Purple Bazzill
5. What do your friends and family think about the event?
Once the plants grow up about to the height of the top of the tyre we'll fill them up again with more soil, just leaving a bit showing, add a tyre and repeat till it starts flowering - I wonder how high they'll end up, 3 maybe 4 high?
And here's the thing about shopping, and perhaps the main reason I avoid it. When I am out there, surrounded by at all the pretty things, I see all kinds of stuff I had no idea I wanted. I covet. I lust. I have an inner battle. I often lose. To make a predictable story short, I left the Chanel counter with a sample spray vial of Coco for Mom. And a bag of Chanel items I do not need for me. An eyeshadow quad? Really? I'm not the Hydra monster. I have only two eyes, but it often feels like my becoming a beauty blogger has heightened my awareness for beauty products I used to largely ignore.
If you have a chance, please take a moment and visit their spots – there is some mighty cool stuff a-brewing around there parts. Ch-ch-check it!
What can I say.
AMERICAN SUPPORTERS will rally on 27 February for our cause
As we drank down the bottle, I noticed there were many people consuming white wines around us. I asked the wine steward which was the most popular white, an unexpected choice when eating beef. He explained that the full-bodied punch that a Chardonnay packs was the best seller.
I felt like eating a doughnut the other day. That's one of those foods we rarely have in our house, mostly because neither of us has much self control. You know about SH and the Dill Pickle Pringles in the basement. Just today, I brought home a bunch of post-Easter candy from Walgreen's. It's half price after Easter. You knew that, right? They even had robin's eggs this year. The past few years, they've been running out of those before Easter. I got two bags of the Cadbury dark chocolate eggs and a bag of dark chocolate M&Ms. All of this at SH's request, I might add, so I asked him to hide them from me.
We will persevere though. I love the bikes and I think I look pretty cool riding one and as that’s about the only time I look pretty cool, can’t give up on that.
You raise your children and you teach ‘them to walk straight and sure
Widmer Brothers Brewing Co Portland Noggin Grog Imperial Wit takes the Belgian Wit to the extreme with its 9% ABV Noggin’ Grog
1 large chicken breast, grilled or fried in a little olive oil
Yeah, I know! Get a load of that heel! It's three stripes: chocolate, a mid-brown and then the bone colour for the rest of the shoe. These are called the "Shala" and the colour palette is called pebble and tan. These join my other two pairs of Tsubos: these yellow ones, and my Acreas.
International food prices spiked almost 40 percent last year, indicating that the monetary price is finally catching up with the true costs of cheap food: obesity in the U.S., malnutrition in developing countries and environmental degradation everywhere. This issue is devoted to these problems and some possible solutions, many of them sprinkled throughout the essays and reports.
Thanks for letting me show you what Shan and I have been working on and I'm hoping' I've helped to motivate some of you to get your "around the house" projects done! Well I'm off to make a wreath for our front door talk with you soon!
Well, I just wasn’t feeling the greys I was picking out. So I decided to practice what I preach and wait for the inspiration to strike in the form of bedding or drapes.
Over two parts, this article will analyse the following: the landscape going into the 13th general elections, how we can expect both Pakatan Rakyat and Umno linked interests to act in the coming weeks and months in light of this landscape, some increasingly likely scenarios for election day and its aftermath including the possibility of violence, and what we can do to prevent any disasters.
Cue wishlist:
With an "anything goes" attitude all morals have long since gone out of the window. There will be no allowance for Ronan's age and he will be expected to perform on late- night shows and dinners etc. And if he get exhausted, there's always some sleaze-bag on hand ready to put a line of coke under his nose. I've seen it a million times.
Lyndsey xx
-He will unite ALL things through Christ.
the tiny advantage in your genes.
Another issue is my love of dialogue. Some writers have trouble writing dialogue, I really enjoy it. I hear my characters talking in my head, that makes it so easy. My challenge comes in building the setting, showing the emotions in ways other than words.
Maintenance and Adjustments
In any case, we are doing pretty well so far! Our class average for letter sounds on entry was 9 letter sounds per child. Now, after five weeks, our class average is 24 out of 26 letter sounds per child! And I think that is pretty great! The child with the least amount of sounds now has 17 of them. Our class average on entry for letter names was 32 out of 52, and now it is 42. The child with the least amount of letter names has 15 of them.
my Dad is doing great - in extreme pain all the time from the knee replacement - but PT says he's way ahead of schedule in what he can do - and i am so proud of him pushing himself to the limits to get himself back to health - he still has another knee to get done - but that won't be for awhile, a long while to say the least - i just can't wait to be able to see him back in his garden, on his boat, making wine and cheese, and doing all the things that make my Dad one of a kind and so special!
Taliban militants have regularly been targeting the convoys, even when they are heavily protected.
C) ...walk with a crutch, so long strolls on the beach are out of the question.
Waiting for the tournament to begin.
The little dutch house is a KLM collector. When you fly First/Business class on KLM overseas you receive these collector houses filled with liquor. They are meant to be collected not drank. We have several from our days traveling back and forth from Germany to USA. I paid $3 for this one!
He approached the receptionist's desk. The receptionist was a large, imposing woman who looked like a wrestler. He gave her his name and in a very loud voice the receptionist said: "Yes, I see your name here... you want to see the doctor about impotence, right?"
The Boston Beer Company, brewer of Samuel Adams products, was directly involved in promoting the incredibly crass "Sex for Sam" publicity stunt hosted by radio shock jocks Opie and Anthony which ended in a couple being arrested for seeking to copulate in a vestibule of St. Patrick's Cathedral in New York. While the radio station pulled the show and suspended the hosts, to my knowledge the Boston Beer Company has never indicated any regrets over its direct promotion of the sacrilege. My own request to their customer service department for clarification went unanswered. [Update: But thankfully, I'm wrong. Jim Koch did indeed apologize for his participation.]
One really interesting summer writing idea for children is the notion that some people love sultry, hot, humid days while others can’t wait for the first snowfall. Which one does your child prefer? Why? What would they do if there was only hot (or only cold) weather?
Some advice, if your coming to town for the London Olympics this summer, pack some sandwiches and buy a bottle of drink airside before departure, you’ll need it trust me.
I have always been an open book, never quite understanding what it really means. I realize now that being vulnerable is a gift... just like each and every part of us is a gift!
HÁ: It’s nice. We can stop by the health food store when we’re on tour.
The second photo is of course, a sun coming out at night, which seems weird and very impossible to happen, unless there’s an eclipse happening. So, yeah… it’s really a celestial oxymoron if you see a sun coming at night.
scoantv
Prior to Toby Tiangco’s Senate appearance, House Majority Leader Neptali Gonzales III reportedly threatened to expel the Navotas solon. Sought for reaction on Tiangco’s revelations, Gonzales said, “I just want him to dye.”
Time for Angelina's WISH to come true!
Audrey's first day at the beach.
You’ve got to remember: Japan has an aging and shrinking population.
Alexander Keith’s is sending its brews to more than 20 U.S. markets — Nova Scotia Style Lager, Nova Scotia Style Pale Ale and Nova Scotia Style Brown Ale.
When I say “discuss” of course I mean that he chatted away excitedly while I, with absolutely no knowledge of the subject, soon discovered that a few head nods and the occasional, “Oh yes,” or “Fascinating!” convinced him that we shared the same burning passion.
Carpaccio of venison lightly smoked with juniper
It's that time of year again...back to work. As much as I hate to see the summer end, I'm glad to have been called back. Last year I used a color theme throughout my room...black, white and pink. This year, I've decided to go with an ocean/beach theme. So, I decided to make a few things for myself and the room. Today's project is a calendar that I made for myself. I keep one on my desk all the time, and it's always been something plain (and cheap). As you can see, not plain...but pretty cheap.
Truman Capote, who arguably wrote the best true crime “novel” ever, couldn’t write unless he was lying down, in bed or on a couch with a cigarette and a coffee. As the day progressed he moved from coffee to mint tea to martinis. As he described it, he had to be puffing and sipping.
21. Bahr, Robert, Least of All Saints, The Story of Aimee Semple McPherson, Prentice Hall, 1979, p. 105
I look back on that night with a smile as probably the high-water-mark of my desirability as a man - the one night in my life when I had a roomful of hotties wishing they were the one with me. I don't say that with any bitterness - I'm infinitely more comfortable with who I am now, and wouldn't go back there for all the money in the world. But I'll admit I had many a fantasy of how I might have taken advantage of things that night. It's a fun memory.
The area is cited for 5,000 housing units, a new public school, $175 million worth of utility and road infrastructure and 10 acres of waterfront park, he added.
dust of the desert becomes
Short sleeve striped shirt, Jones NY - Goodwill
"What does it mean?" Augustus said.
Over 25 ideas were pitched on Friday night, from mobile learning through technology to calibrate medical devices and an avatar for online clothes shopping. The nine teams that made it to the end of the weekend included charging electric vehicles through the road, experimental maths teaching and mobile phone based biometics. Not just apps and websites!
Our beloved prophet Spencer W. Kimball had much to say about the role of mothers in the home and their callings and responsibilities. I am impressed tonight to share with you some of his inspired pronouncements. I fear that much of his counsel has gone unheeded, and families have suffered because of it. But I stand this evening as a second witness to the truthfulness of what President Spencer W. Kimball said. He spoke as a true prophet of God.
Say what? The first time he said "Extinguicell," I thought, "He's looking at the guy's fire extinguisher, but in five minutes he won't remember the name he made up." I should know better. Augie doesn't forget. What's more, he treats all the names exactly the same. I like that. It makes me believe that when he meets kids named Abdi and Pang and Anousone he'll take their names in stride. (Actually, he and Vi already have classmates with what we used to consider unusual
Geej: (In a totally dry, teen-agery tone and timed perfectly with the soulful first solo guitar notes of "Purple Rain") No, Mommy. I don't care about Prince, and I've got to get out of the car or I'm going to be tardy.
They've found some more astronomical calculations by the Mayans, which were the basis for the Mayan Calendar. Apparently, these calculations predict the position of the moon to years way past the current projected end of the world this year.
In the pamphlets there is a story about a little boy who has had three relapses and everyone he fights and comes back from. His spirit is so inspiring it just makes me want to give and give until I can’t give anymore. Then reality settles in and even though I would gladly give everything I own to help a child not suffer, I cannot do that, nor do I expect anyone else to do that. But I can give a little bit, I can and have offered to have my head shaved, to have people sponsor me for this event, but also I am going to give some money as well. I am not well off, I don’t know many people who are well off, but I know I can give at least one dollar and I am going to give at least that.
But I can take silhouette photos.
The girls may not qualify as my friends, but they do know me as well as (if not better) than my closest friends. They may know a lot of truths about their dad that they wish they didn't, but it actually got easier for them once they did understand that it really wasn't them, but him.
I guess my concern is the young generation havin smart phones to begin with. They are impressionable. One friend at the lunch table says ” Hey Dorothy, come on over here. I wanna take your picture. It will tell you how pretty you are.” And BAM! she gets a 10. Then what? The girl becomes (or rather tries) to change her self into something that is not needed.
“Oh. Hey. Hi,” she greeted in an awkward way she thought she had grown out of.
These are the things I remember: the way her nylons sagged at the ankles, her brown shoes. The way she put on lipstick when the doorbell rang. How she said, "It's your time" when it was my turn to play in a game. How soft she was, and how much she loved us.
We also used a pre made chex mix, teddy grahams and some hazelnuts. Not only was it the perfect mix of sweet and salty but I think it is so fun to look at too!
Firm conviction is no fiction
Maybe not. Maybe that is the definition of the place where the seeds were planted, but the fledging plant was so overwhelmed by the thorns of the world’s cares that it suffocated. Perhaps we are the exact profile of the cultural Christian, rather than the radicals Jesus called us to be.
1. She used to despise the squirrels in her yard; now she loves them and feeds them (bread and crackers, not poison). Alzheimers works in mysterious ways.
He’s given that assignment: go deep into the Cambodian jungle to find Colonel Kurtz, a decorated American soldier who has apparently gone insane and started fighting his own war with his own makeshift army. When he finds him, he is to kill him, by any means necessary.
Feature: Chris Maddock
Sushi lover? Then you’ll love this place. Take yourself and at least three other people to Yamato, a Japanese restaurant right off Chiswick Road station on the B green line of the Boston T. You’ll get the most amount of fish at this restaurant for your money, and trust me, you’ll get a lot.
part god, as I believe,
and fake golden–
with strong creative purpose.
please contact us with your address so we can send your fabulous red, white and blue prize!
Hope everyone is having a fabulous Thursday and I promise to not be gone for so long again...even when I am feeling yucky and in a funk.
The kitchen is still not done, everything's going slower than we hoped (I'll put up a post about our progress tomorrow), so we'll celebrate with a proper American birthday cake next weekend. Right now I'm super excited for him to wake up from his nap so we can open up his birthday present: a play indoor tent for his room. I can't wait to see what he thinks!
Just last week, a foreign question popped into my mind: Will I someday grow too old to tell stories for children? I am, after all, going to turn 35 this month. Almost as quickly as the question showed up, the answer nearly bowled me over. No way! Some things are as deeply ingrained as breathing and walking and laughing.
It's the lovely Anita's challenge this week and she has chosen the theme - ribbon! (Which was one of my original thoughts for a challenge but I was pipped to it and so came up with my nice challenge a few weeks back ha ha!)
So, once I'm off my "maternity leave" of bigger projects, sometime in May or June I will be buying paint, installing a new mirror and getting my hubby to change the lighting and door, which is really old. It is fun to dream up ideas--can't wait to show you my finished bathroom!
* Sleeping with a giant belly can be tricky, so I LOVED LOVED LOVED the maternity pillow in the middle months of pregnancy. They look crazy, but I swear by them. You can wrap your arms and legs around them and sleep soundly through the night. Alex joked that it was like having a third person in our bed, but it was soooo worth it. I even lugged my giant pillow on a cross-country trip to California!
As of right now, my bookshelves look relatively empty (and this picture doesn’t include the 20 or so books that I still have to shelve since I acquired so many more used books when at college in Asheville). However, I love all of the space because it just means that I have room for more books. Also, breaking up the shelves by each 2 letters will definitely help since I won’t have to shift my books around every time I have to add a new book to my collection.
And now we have Slim Chance, Redhook's entry into the low-cal sweepstakes. It's not the first craft-brewed light beer, nor even the first light ale. Hell, it's not even the first low-cal Redhook ale (Sunrye tips the scale at just six more calories than Slim Chance). It is, transparently, a market-driven lunge toward sales.
“If You’re Ready to Learn” is “a parody,” McKnight added. “I’m having fun, because basically, I have nothing else to do. I’m at home, I have a studio, I’m a professional songwriter, I can write and sing anything, and here’s a little fun to share with you, and look what happened.”
(10x PNG @ 300ppi)
Marshall’s work doesn’t thrust any of these possibilities into our purview. Instead, the ghosts of alternative histories awaken the real histories inside us. This seems to be a fundamentally different take on the Rococo than what is usually seen in the contemporary artworld. In ArtForum last month, Meredith Martin defined the dominate features of Rococo through Contemporary Art’s interpretation of it -- Jeff Koons’ embracing of “its democratic nature,” Cindy Sherman’s noticing its “malleability of identity,” Elizabeth Peytons’ nostalgia and meditations on “interiority,” Karen Kilimnik’s use of its theatricality and artifice as alternative models for pleasure, Yinka Sonibare’s “amplification of power and commodity fetishism,” and artists like Jorge Pardo and Rudolf Stingel’s use of Rococo design elements in their work.
A similar venue, Club Djembe, is located just down the street from Le Fida. At the time, it was a veritable Malian institution, boasting heavyweights like the Super Rail Band. These pioneers were a national treasure, but their music catered to the old guard nostalgic for the halcyon days of Mali’s fabled hotel bands.
Decatur & Woodstock @ 7:00 pm
Those who can, make the pilgrimage to the top of Majuba. In air thinner than my coast-bound lungs are used to, I huff up the steep path. At the summit, a group of eight Pretoria University students sit with a large, fluttering flag. They discuss the 123-year old battle—attack tactics, weapons used, numbers killed -- as if each has lived it.
thought you might want to read these as well. However, since some may
6:30 a.m. I hear movement. Maybe the small humans remember me! Hooooowwwwlllll, I’m over here! Three small (sleepy) humans come out and play. I am SO HAPPY to see them! They go back in. I watch through the patio door. When will they come out again? The humans get in the car and drive away. I watch them through the deck rails. They are leaving me! No! Hooooowwwwwllll!
On the other hand though, that commute will absolutely drain me. It wasn’t fun to drive to that end of the county when I worked down there for 7 years. In fact, sadly enough, I was happy when I had to come in 2 hours later near the end. That only took me 20 minutes.
1 The New York Times on Philippines overtaking India as the world’s top call centre. Americans calling the customer service lines of their airlines, phone companies and banks are now more likely to speak to Mark in Manila than Bharat in Bangalore. Over the last several years, a quiet revolution has been reshaping the call center business: the rise of the Philippines, a former US colony that has a large population of young people who speak lightly accented English and, unlike many Indians, are steeped in American culture. More Filipinos — about 400,000 — than Indians now spend their nights talking to mostly American consumers. The jobs have come from the US, Europe and, to some extent, India as outsourcers followed their clients to the Philippines. India, where offshore call centers first took off in a big way, fields as many as 350,000 call center agents, according to some industry estimates. The Philippines, which has a population one-tenth as big as India’s, overtook India this year, according to Jojo Uligan, executive director of the Contact Center Association of the Philippines. The growing preference for the Philippines reflects in part the maturation of the outsourcing business and in part a preference for American English. In the early days, the industry focused simply on finding and setting up shop in countries with large English-speaking populations and low labour costs, which mostly led them to India. But executives say they are now increasingly identifying places best suited for specific tasks. India remains the biggest destination by far for software outsourcing.
Again, not the dollar. Real wealth is ownership of some thing, be it property or real estate, stock in a corporation (which represents ownership in that corporation), or other tangible or intrinsic assets that have a value to more than one person. A dollar is used as a contract to acquire that asset from the other entity or person. The dollar is nothing more than an unfulfilled portion of a contract, and must be traded elsewhere in order for it to be transformed into real wealth. The dollar’s contractual value is determined by the corporate persons that are appointed by the people you vote for (or don’t vote for) in government, via the treasury and the Federal Reserve, whom once again has the military industrial complex to back up what it says the trading value of the dollar is world-wide.
– PACIFIC WREN, Griffith Woods, John Thompson
Governor Romney supported it in the state, a state that is a — pretty much a model for what Obamacare is going to look like — the highest health care costs in the country, 27 percent above the average, average waiting time — 94 percent of the people in Massachusetts are now insured, but there was just a survey that came out and said one in four don’t get the care they need because of the high cost. So, you have a card, you’re covered, but you can’t get care.
Strip on bodice - word window at edge of paper (super thin) - didn't attempt to adhere to front - wrapped the strip around the bodice and attached in the back
The German philosopher Nietzsche had said in so many words that the Christian ethic of allowing the meek to inherit the earth would in the end undermine the very fabric of society and ultimately bring about its downfall.
'til then...
“I’ll give her the Xbox controller that we got but can’t use since we don’t have an Xbox.”
Me: That’s great, Ron but, it’s a tablet, not a phone.
02. Once
One of the 10 Commandments is Thou Shalt Not Covet…or Envy. It doesn’t matter whether you consider yourself Religious or even Spiritual, or if you agree with the separation of church and state. The 10 Commandments have some great guidelines for just being a good person.
· Work in partnership with the leadership team to define new strategies, solutions and capabilities across the organization
Frank… is that… are you… Are you wearing a tuxedo shirt under your overalls? And is that a pine cone? A pine cone with a… demonic red eye? Oh, lordy.
9/17 – Louisville, KY – Uncle Pleasants
S: What about some of the hard to reach communities within the jungle?
Persuade Me is available in e book and print for all the Austenesque fans from all the usual places where good books are sold! And here's Juliet's blurb to tempt you some more:
Visual Arts (concentration: painting) and English (concentration: creative writing).
If you've ever been to Holt Renfrew at Yorkdale mall, you might have noticed that Benefit has their Brow Bar there. However, I recently found out that Benefit was being pulled out of Holt and they weren't going to carry the brand anymore...so sad, and I was about to get my brows done.
I was hoping to film today but the weather is against us and the media lab is full of students and today is an official waste of time. Kind of perfect to start my essay but I was prepared for editing. By the way, I have two news. Yep, a good one and a bad one: we have finished a couple of scenes that look great BUT… and here it comes… the main actor couldn’t film anymore so we had to stop filming and prepare the casting again. It’s not that bad because is a lesson that can cost you much more later when you shot a feature movie, so, good to know! Every time have a plan B.
I have not drunk milk for sixty years.
Those who act in such a way to undermine the party will be liable to a disciplinary hearing as regards their internet activism, if it can be demonstrated that they intended, or should have known, their comments could be used by the enemy against us and have damaged the party and our long term political growth.
4. Flip pancakes when bubbles appear. Cook until golden brown.
It was now just the two of us. Laying out in the dark of the back, the night bringing in a chill, and the milky summer grass then damp and cold beneath us. I emptied the last cigarette out the box. “No twos no threes no lugs!” I blurted, as my only answer to the long forgotten question. Then I struck a match and lit up the hell around us. Billy smiled anew, it was just something we said. The night was down upon us. Soon the bars would spill out and our lives would be ruined again. Love me tender in the Ghetto. Billy would get his 'twos'. I could taste the sulphur in my mouth. The sweet end of the match
FOR the last couple of years, I have been excited to see that Scholastic has started to begin to offer ebooks as an option through their book order program. When I got my iPads, I was thrilled at the prospect of getting books on the iPads for kids to read through a company I respect and support. When I received a grant for ebooks, I immediately looked into Scholastic’s program, as they often offer books at affordable prices and I would be able to stretch my money farther…always looking to do that.
Hey ladies! I'm here today to show a layout I just made using the new Jack and Jill kit from the fabulous NoelMignon.com and using a sketch from Creative Scrappers.
To start, I used one of my cabinet card images which I scanned and printed onto cardstock and cut out, two 7Gypsies book covers, a scrap of corrugated cardboard to create the depth and mimic book pages, die-cut chipboard gears, and a knife.
It means our sins can be forgiven:
Kitty.
I went to the pharmacy today, picked up am enormous bag of drugs and came home to sort them. Then I discovered that we are one short and will run out of pills over the weekend. Under the circumstances this is absolutely unacceptable, so I made a phone call to CHOP, leaving my cell number for contact. Luckily for me I didn't leave the house yet - they returned the call on my HOME phone. Ugh.
thought. All of us have potential. For Example
Let me explain....... My relationship with Doctor Who started in 1975 or thereabouts. I think the first one I remember was The Arc In Space and I must have been 3 at the time. The Saturday routine in our house back in the 70's was simple. Get up, dressed, fed and then off to the shops. In the afternoon we went swimming then on the way back we would get fish and chips for tea and then get ready for this weeks thrilling instalment of Doctor Who. It was a magical time, being young and witnessing all new episodes of Tom Baker strutting his stuff. I named my goldfish Sarah and Harry. We went to Blackpool to see the museum, my mum knitted me a scarf and at Christmas I got the Doctor Who annual which was my most treasured possession.
So when I look at my own
17 How Do You Speak To An Angel
breath is the realisation of a project that has been rolling on and off my desk for about 2 years and I am pleased to record that it was home from the printer in November 2011. There’s something about the death of loved friends that tends to focus the mind and I realised that I just needed to get on and do it and not look back later and be regretful.
Out of reach, an idea only, yet furiously fought for, risking bloody
I really like my students. I am especially fond of my two sophomore classes who I see for two block periods for each day. We have running jokes and an easy rapport. Most importantly, I think they are learning. My sophomore retakes and Juniors are presenting me with a greater challenge. I have a class of students who have failed Sophomore English at least once, sometimes twice and many of these students are also in my Junior English class. As you could imagine, this brand of students come with a distinct set of challenges and behavior issues. Charming as they can be, their antics can dismantle a class in moments. I am reworking all the curriculum I planned over the summer for the Sophomore retakes and this makes me sick to my stomach when I think of the uncertainty and the work ahead.
Pirogies, yes, they are delish and NO you cannot get them in Florida well unless you buy them in the grocery store and that's just not okay..
3 granted
Herman Cain shouts out to the radical right
J and I have also been playing LOTS of old school Nintendo on our Wii. Best invention ever. We are cracking up at how we can't beat worlds that we tore up when we were 12.
I have a staff meeting. At 7am tomorrow. Crap!
Rabbit Rillete
where we could spread out and run and play and jump and climb.
As was nearing the entrance to Mzulft, Se’rith suddenly became dizzy and her vision blurred. As her vision cleared there stood a Psijjic Monk. He congratulated Se’rith on her progress but warned her to get back to the College immediately. Events were in motion that only she could stop and the College was in dire danger. The Psijic’s had set her on the right path and she was capable of bringing things to a successful end. As the monk winked out of existence, his words of stressing the importance of getting back to the College wafted through the ether. The Dunmer emerged into bright sunlight, the warmth a welcome sensation on limbs so long underground. They mad the short climb up to Primby to rest and eat before the walk back to Winterhold.
Alas! it was the last home date for the Thunder. But the cold could not dampen the spirits of all those who made it out to New Hamburg. The accommodations were out for everybody, the playground and hoola hoop area, the vendors from both teams selling the KDD merch and newlywed Christa could not stay away from Derby and devoutly took her place behind the Tri-City table selling off wares and the remaindered Thunder shirts. Plus there were prizes, the 50-50, snacks and cotton candy!
lots of love for a wall.
Councillor Dida Berku and members of Les Amis de Meadowbrook will be leading the two-hour tour “Meadowbrook: A Treasure to Discover” on Saturday, May 5 and Sunday, May 6, 2012 at 11:30 am starting at Richard Schwartz Park (Côte Saint-Luc Rd. at Westluke Ave., bus route 103). The walk is free of charge, but participants are encouraged to RSVP at dberku@cotesaintluc.org. During the Saturday walk, Councillor Berku will be joined by wild-life biologist Patrick Ash, and on Sunday by naturalist and environmental educator David Fletcher.
Try to imagine that same sign inside, hanging on the wall in the COD. Hard to do, isn't it? See, they think it's okay here, because you're still early in the queue and they figure "the show" hasn't, you know, reeelly started yet. That's just dumb. Also, it's practically telling you that this is a haunted house, which is jumping the gun. And that's to say nothing about a full-size ghost horse standing right there outside. Ugh. It's all supposed to look innocent at this point. The 1995 hearse gag is the true grandfather of Pepe Le Queue. Alice Davis is right: it's out of place.
So, advertising works by developing awareness, and how much is it worth it to companies to pay for the number of times it's brand is exposed to you, the savvy consumer?
Typhoon jets, stationed at the Royal Air Force’s (RAF) Northolt airbase in northwest London, will fly over London, and pilots will test procedures for intercepting any aircraft which breach the restricted airspace imposed around the Games.
NARS Sheer Glow - Mont Blanc (applied with a damp beauty blender sponge)
Makan gaji aje!
FINAL VERDICT: “Link’s journey to Labrynna is puzzle-heavy, and more about thinking and careful exploration than thrills and action like its sibling title, but even so, it compensates with a lengthier quest, a more engaging plot, and still being one of the most amazing games to ever grace the Game Boy Color, even so late in its life cycle! The Zelda series may have already used a time travel hook, but dedicated fans will still find Oracle of Ages to be one of the most expansive and enduring portable Zelda adventures that has yet been released!”
For my first one I went with Fall colors. Don't know why I love Fall colors so much, but they have such warmth to them.
It's hard to even decide what I'm talking about when I say 'virginity'. Is it oral, anal, vaginal? Can you be a penetrative virgin when you've given a hundred handjobs? Is it a physical or mental state? Does it rely on the existence of an intact hymen (which can be destroyed by simple, innocent physical activity at any age)? In that case, can boys be virgins when they don't have the equipment for it? Or does masturbation get rid of it?
The poor thing …. I wondered how old when he/she died cos the grave was indeed smaller than Hadi’s. No name was given …. my heart was sad thinking that the parents did not even named the child but then I stopped myself cos I did not know the parents’ situation and the circumstance around the death of the child…. so it’s not up to me to speculate and judge.
it’ll be simply ended
What I thought: Return to Exile - while seeming to borrow a few concepts from Harry Potter - is immensely imaginative. There was one strange character who I had a hard time getting my head around - but for the most part I loved the creativity of Patten's world-building. One creature I particularly enjoyed was the giant Gnomon mother Rauschlot. I also appreciated that although the book is likely to be viewed as a "boy book" (a gender-biased concept I despise), the leader of the young monster hunters is female and the main character Sky has a sister who adds some comic relief. The plot of Return to Exile is quick-moving and compelling - which was crucial to my reading enjoyment given the exhaustion I've felt from my "day job" of late - but it is complicated and also quite intense and violent, which makes me think that the book is better for older kids than a "middle grade" label might imply. I look forward to the December release of the sequel The Legend Thief.
We bought a new TV for Christmas 2 years ago, and I was able to clean-up the shelves a little bit more. Here's how it looked for awhile:
This card dates from about 1907. If you're specifically interested in streetcars of Wisconsin, you should check out the Transport Co. Web Station website.
9. Sunday, I got the fun privilege of going to Birmingham with Mark to the big farmers market where he gets all the ferns and tropicals for the greenhouses. It was so nice to just be with him alone on the drive there and back, and it was really neat to see the big market. We talked a lot about future plans.
And then I was home. I recognized the gravel of my driveway when it come into view between my sneakers. I looked up. Despite it all, my heart gave a little jump. It was home. It was sanctuary, of a sorts. It was a bed, and clean socks, and lights. I turned and crunched my way up the gravel to the rough concrete driveway in front of the garage. No red Honda Civic. No Subaru station wagon. No anything. I climbed the porch and pushed open the front door. There was a light on in the kitchen. That was a good sign. “Mom??” I called out. “Mom, I’m home!”
2 chickens (2 1/2 pounds each), cut into quarters
Next to consider.... power source. Unless you want to drag a really long extension cord behind you all day, we're talking batteries here. We can chose between standard and lithium batteries, AA, C, D, or CR123a batteries, and rechargeable units as well. The larger the battery does not mean the brighter the light. A flashlight with a pair of little CR123a batteries can easily be as bright as one carrying four large D cells. Bigger batteries mean longer life, and this must be considered. Unless the flashlight is rechargeable, commonality of the battery is also an issue. A light with dead batteries is useless if none are available.
Our real estate agent has put her whole life on hold to help us get this house. If you need a kickass real estate agent in Seattle, I'll give you her info but she may not be able to help you right away; she will be busy sawing at the chain I've used to attach myself to the house and telling me to calm the eff down because I'm screaming, "It's MINE, it's MINE, give the greedy hamster her house!"
Before the days of the mania for Health and Safety, of course, which is rotting the moral fibre of the nation etc. …(cont. p. 94 of the Daily Telegraph).
and the United States in order to look for a solution.
The idea of play in some respects meets the capitalistic needs. For example, new media are now used to make people play in their little bedrooms, sometimes getting them less conscious about their own material conditions, separating people from each other. So, play is a really powerful tool to make people forget what the real problems are.
I'd be out of place and out of time,
DC3A6E99-EAB0-48E8-237D-A3FCE3A0EE2E
I digress. Like I do when I'm obsessed with something, I talk to EVERYONE about it. I was talking to my hair stylist because she's like 15 & gorgeous & always has good makeup. She told me about these YouTube videos by a London based makeup artist, Pixiwoo & recommended I watch them. OMG, y'all. These videos are CHANGING MY LIFE.
Whoopdi Friggin Doo,
Night 2 was a lot better than night 1. I still slept on the couch, 4 a few reasons. My beds put together n made but I have a shit all over it 2 put away still. It’s freakin hot up there, I really need 2 get fans 4 each room. And I wanted to watch tv. So since I decided I want tv in my room I’m gonna need to get a tv for the kids now. But that’s ok, that means they r probably gonna wanna sleep with me in my room till then and I am perfectly ok with that! I really wish they were here with me now…
I have adjusted UHM to fit my needs and I am happy to say that both the kids and I are all much happier for it compared to our old system!
WUWT? has gotten to the point that I not only expect it to be the same thing each time, but I get excited about that sameness. Relatively few sketches can accomplish that. For a moment there, though, it looked like De Niro and Robin Williams were going to stop Deandre from doing what he always does. I debated among myself what was the best direction for the sketch to take at this point. It was unsurprising that Deandre would eventually start the music again, but this would have been the one way in which WUWT? should invite breaking the formula. Maybe that can happen eventually, perhaps on Kenan’s last show, but at the moment, I think this was the right way to go. But it wasn’t so cool that De Niro eventually just stopped talking and Williams did little more than mutter.
The US government ran a budget deficit of 198 billion in March 2012. The March figure pushed the deficit up to $779 billion for the first six months of fiscal 2012.
glowing with a newfound warmth.
Before long it was midnight, fireworks time..
In Chicago, you may really need a hat. In Oakland, a hat is worn for effect, not effectiveness.
Fried Pickles - April 7
O my son, do not let us be slothful because of the easiness of the way; for so was it with our fathers; for so was it prepared for them, that if they would look they might live; even so it is with us. The way is prepared, and if we will look we may live forever. And now, my son, see that ye take care of these sacred things, yea, see that ye look to God and live. Go unto this people and declare the word, and be sober. My son, farewell. (Alma 37:46-47)
Make the dough using all the above ingredients the normal way you make basic bread dough. Knead for about 10 mins until smooth, silky and elastic. Allow to double, knock back and shape into small balls. (Makes approx 18).
After a brutal attack left him without a limb and his team dead, former Green Beret Haytham “Hawk” Wilson is angry at life and God. Bitter, he pushes everyone out of his life. Every day he relives his decision to send the Afghan boy home rather than following orders to kill any who came upon his hidden team. So when on his deathbed at age 36, eaten alive by grief and regret, he’s offered the chance to relive any seven hours, Hawk is determined to go back, kill the boy, and save his team. The decision is simple . . . until he gets there.
Without my bunky I’d be so sad
This is the balancing act that we juggle all the time in both our personal and professional lives, mostly unconsciously. I believe that by being aware of the needs which require fulfilling and the priority we give them we can better understand the choices we make.
In this, the first episode of our new experimental supplementary podcast, your two potato hosts indulge in a little late-night discussion on such varied topics as being British, buying Africa, science and why this podcast is exactly the same as Baywatch Nights.
Go figure. I like it when God acts like Himself instead of some idea I have in my head. It might just be that this is all that remains.
The fear of ending up in someone's never-ending slush pile, coupled with the nagging inner voice that told her it was crazy to give up a successful business prompted Cheryl to continue writing as a hobby for many years. Finally, she decided it was time to take the plunge into writing full-time. Ten books later, she believes it was the best decision she's ever made.
A smile is only genuine
For that reason, I’ve made a pact with myself to only discuss monetary policy in writing, unless somebody specifically asks my opinion on the matter. If this topic bores you, by all means feel free to click away.
The thing that struck me most about this triple crown of fabulous mythological females is the incredible contrast and color that is captured by the Copic Markers that brought them to life. Three master artists, all using the tool of choice in their field to bring bubbly bouncing beauty from comic book imagination to cardboard reality. Wow.
and dreaming of veggies!
Then everyone laughed, another of the men farted, and everything was back to normal.
(Many thanks to Annie for inviting me to join this series!)
Don't worry so will I.
You will go on (breathe out)
ARE YOU FUCKING SERIOUS??
How do you survive the query process?
Signifying nothing.
Escoring at least 40 out of 45 in my scoring system are inducted into The Forties Club. In my judgment, these writers have done their job excellently. Their strong, skilled writing brought their stories to life. Asterisks have been added to those names in the contest index who are inducted into the Forties Club.
(INAUDIBLE) with the United States.
When I was in high school: it was about calories… how many calories did a bagel have in it?
New symbols are created just as quickly as its meaning. It’s important to keep up-to-date vocabulary in planning new lessons to keep them fresh, and students excited about learning.
12. CARE — If you don’t care about this project or what you’re creating or this class, why are you doing it? Drop the class. Don’t waste time and money on something you don’t like. It’s disappointing for those of us who want to learn from each other who DO care, and have to deal with those who don’t.
On the finer footprints on the rock, all existence experience micro-gravity causality
Location: The Embassy of the Republic Union of Myanmar, No. 8C Jalan Ampang Hilir, 55000 Kuala Lumpur.
Oh well, it's only stuff.
So the first challenge is to learn to imagine - to inhabit - places you've never been (Victorian London, pre-Colombian Chile); to get inside faiths or morals you've never held (original sin, sun-worship); to hear voices that you've never heard (what would a tape recorder have picked up in Tudor Old St Paul's, or in St Paul's own study?)...
Translation to Elsa language: Sorry? Did you just call me a Flighty Courier? Because I know you didn’t say Mighty Warrior.
SO GOOD, SO EASY, and SO TENDER!!
The funny thing about layering color, is that often I start thinking "I want this to be really blue" and then I start layering and it winds-up being really green...for me, the painting process tends to be pretty organic. I like to let the piece evolve the way it wants to evolve.
What are the metaphors for rabbits chewing their own cud, pi being a round number, bats being birds, whales being fish, slaughtering of men, women, children, and livestock for being of a different faith, smashing babies against rocks, Noah’s Flood, six days of creation, etc.? There isn’t a metaphor. It was meant to be taken as fact, because desert tribesmen who were fearful of death tried to make sense of the natural world, and the best explanation they could come up with (which wasn’t, and still isn’t, an explanation at all) was that it was a magical man in the sky who did it all. However, science has shown that those things did not happen and do not happen. The Earth (and the rest of the universe for that matter) was not created in six days. Noah’s Flood is nowhere in the geological strata. Rabbits don’t chew their own cud. Bats and whales are mammals, not birds or fish, respectively. Pi is 3.1415…, not 3. These things were meant to be taken as FACT, not metaphor, but Christian apologists try to explain them away by saying, “It was all a metaphor!”
The morning is the best part of the day, everything is just coming into focus, birds are usually singing, and it’s just the best way to pace your day. Tired in the morning, I understand most people are. Not a morning person, okay, that’s fine, but you have to work on that, harsh, I know but being a morning person is pretty important.
With her surprising skill in drama, Jaycee also gave her best emotions while singing. That’s why it was such a splendid opening for the contest proper that made everyone so much excited of what the next contestant have.
Sound bites from Unspent Time:
Here’s the book description:
35. HP and the Goblet of Fire - Rowling (2000)
The sauce was 4 oz. coconut milk, 1 tsp. tamari, as much green (or red) curry paste as you can handle, a tiny little bit of lime to balance the flavor, and black pepper to taste. Bring to a simmer until slightly thickened. We also added a tiny bit of pan-fried green garlic because we had some left over.
When I walk in the spot, this is what I see
UPDATE 19.00 Hrs Sunday 08 April 2012
Apparently as the bus was pulling away she shouted out "I'm not a bigot, you little bastard"
This is a perfect movie. I repeat, this is a perfect movie. I've never said that about any film, and it doesn't necessarily make it the best movie of all time, but it's still perfect. The setting, the writing, the music, the acting, the shots used, the dialogue, and the triumph. This is a movie about a prison, but as the title states, redemption is the center motif, and we see this time and again as the plot rolls on.
Fresh plump blueberries are best.
I've not investigated further but I expect a Google search for the book's title or Essex Farm will provide further information.
07 Good Times Roll 04:02
I have 6 matching teaspoons.
So what is that still, small voice in your head saying?
(I wrote out our conversation but in internet just shut itself down and didn't auto save GRARGGH)
PT: You’ve described that one of the benefits of executive coaching is being able to see ourselves as others may see us – why is this important for success?
The Sunday we visited Canyon Hills Community Church in Bothell was the beginning of their spring food drive to stock the shelves in their pantry. The church’s goal is to collect 25,000 lbs of food. They provided canvas shopping bags with the church logo on it and a complete food list. In a humorous way, the pastor explained they expected each person in the church to donate 10 lbs of food. This broke the larger goal down into smaller, manageable goals that each person could accomplish. The bags served as a reminder and a convenient way to bring the items. The food will be distributed over the next six months to those in need.
Instead, I spent much of yesterday sleeping.
Apparently, business is good!
The winner sits on a throne, wears a tiara, and everyone dresses in pink. It’s an award ceremony for grown-up authors, styled by a very girly eight-year-old.
I agree with this approach in looking at education. It emphasizes that importance of the uniqueness of each child and the importance of education being something greater. It is something that helps develop a young person into a useful important contributor to their society and to be able to carry that on to the next generation. I look forward to looking at the community that I will teach in as well as at each of my individual students and see how I can use these important elements to teach my students in ways that will benefit them.
Sunday - destination and activity yet to be determined with a bodybuilder who also goes to my gym and often does cardio on the treadmills right by the yoga room so I can see his face in the mirror. I'm hoping this second date will be less of an interview, like the first one was. He's totally my type though - tall, dark and handsome with a killer body and NO KIDS or ex wives. I may also try to fit an afternoon date in on Sunday as well, because you know...go big or go home.
HOLLY: Thank you, Stephanie! (I hope you don’t mind I’ve been quoting you all over the place!)
Let’s not say farewell to good tidings, Christmas cheer, a giving spirit, peace, and joy. That can be with us for 12 months, year after year.
While we wouldn’t have any problems scooping it up on the sofa to browse the web, the bulk and lack of connectivity render it useless for packing into a briefcase and taking into a business meeting.
“You’re not going to cause me any trouble, Squeak,” he said, his voice deadly soft. “Because if you do, the rats will be picking their teeth with your bones. You understanding me?”
E is for your bad-ass eagerness to charm
3. Readers access websites from many devices
Saturday Night Live skit.
I'm that mom who is taking videos and pictures of him playing in huge, muddy puddles. The mom that takes great joy in watching him figure out the world and how he fits into it. The mom that would gladly go on walk with him to talk about whatever it is that interests him that day. The mom that stops to smell the flowers and look at bugs all because he finds them fascinating and new.
The DEU says agents also searched a home on Sunnyside Avenue in Murrells Inlet, they say that home was an inactive grow, and was set up for a grow, but the plants had been removed.
I am also sure that there are other ways in which Public Money is being expended which are not shown in the national Budget, so the amounts are surely larger than that estimate.
As my Grandfather Paco and Uncle Manuel worked out a deal on the chairs we started walking back down the hallway we just walked up from. All the doors had nameplates on them and all but one was closed shut. It was open about a half an inch and was completely
- G Class Mercedes
It wasn't until the interview with Coach Cal that I got teary eyed. He is sucks great man, saying this means nothing to his legacy, but means everything to the players and the big blue nation. He is incredible and so extremely loved here in the bluegrass state.
Day 12: How has the rest of your family dealt with your loss?
January 2010 (i.e., forever ago)
1. Theme of Alice - The Flower Meadow - The White Rabbit (1:17)
I want to say THANK YOU to everyone for providing your comments and ideas this month! You really pushed me to succeed and add some important pieces to our binder!
It’s the Manchester Derby. This makes me really homesick.
Wisely used, historical inaccuracies can be the spice to bring the past to life, but like spice they should be used sparingly and knowingly. The historical author should know exactly what she is doing and why. Inaccuracies through ignorance are not allowed, so if I get something wrong, don't be afraid to tell me!
We’d hoped to borrow the hotel bikes to ride around and spend a little time checking out Heerenveen, but they didn’t have enough available for all of us; instead, the 4 guys took the bikes and had an exciting adventure involving contemporary art appreciation and interpretation at small local museum, while mom and I took our cameras and headed out to a nearby walking path to talk (and attempt) photography. We did more talking than actual shooting, but I got a couple of photos I like; here are my two favorites from the walk.
In a large saucepan, heat olive oil and butter until melted. Add garlic and cook for a few minutes.
Tights and cable knit boot socks...
1 red onion, chopped
What advice do you have for fledgling jewelry designers?
175g icing sugar
trend - wrap style rings
The past few days we've been:
Tomatoes not only have different sizes of tomatoes, but there are different sizes of plants and growth habits. Determinate tomatoes don't get very large compared to indeterminate ones. Determinate tomatoes branch out and at the end of the vine they set a terminal bud. As soon as the plant sets fruit they quit growing and put their effort into ripening those tomatoes. Pruning determinate tomatoes will result in low fruit set since the fruit itself is set at the end of the vine. There is also a form of this that is called semi-determinate. These will form terminal buds, but the plant will keep on sending out side branches, so fruit keeps getting set. Usually for a home gardener, you want to get fruit over a long period of time. If you do you can plant varieties that become ripe at different times. Many people like the short manageable size of determinates. They tend to only get 3-4 feet high. Or if you like to can your tomatoes, having all your fruit becoming ripe at the same time is a bonus as it is easier to process everything at once.
Why colour with your lightest marker first? The reason is that you soak your paper with your lightest colour and 'prime it' so that when you add the darker colour it doesn't take as much work to blend the two into a smooth, seamless blend. You are also much less likely to have streaks in your work.
The restaurant feels like one of those hidden backstreet restaurants you get in Tokyo. Entering through swinging wooden doors, you step into a slightly gloomy, tavern-like interior. There are small wooden tables and writing scrawled over the lumpy clay walls. To one side is a bar counter behind which a woman busily tends to skewers on the hissing grill, sending smoky smells wafting through the room.
Rich Chocolate Buttercream
Basically, the earlier you start the better your chance of getting the internship because a) you’ll do a better job on the application process and b) some companies fill up places as they go, meaning if you start an application the night before the chances of there being places left is slim. Also, it’s generally a bad idea to try and apply to 15 different programs by copying and pasting the same answer of each. The companies will know you’ve done it and you’re better off targeting your energies to a handful of places and making a good job of applying.
Not only did I love these (how can I not having been raised on hummus?), but Freddy liked them too! They make a fantastic good-for-you snack. I also attempted a deconstructed hummus version - with sesame oil, garlic powder, paprika, and a squeeze of lemon juice, but the spicy version is way more addicting. Enjoy!
There are two dates in history when tragic events occurred in American history that I will forever remember where I was.
The Smiths
Oh, I also mentioned, in the lost post, that Gary went bowling on the first day of his sabbatical and then went to his eye appointment. The one where he was to find out if he has glaucoma or not. Fortunately his vision is not deteriorating at the present time. We were very glad to hear that. He goes back in four months for another check-up. He does, however, have dry-eye. Just like I do. It's no big deal--you just hydrate your eyes several times a day with eye drops. Actually, I think that dry-eye is probably more common here in the desert than people realize. And age, no doubt, has something to do with dry-eye as well. Not that we're old or anything. Stop laughing. This minute.
And now for this weeks challenge - Paper Piecing, dress up your images by using patterned paper to dress or enhance your image! Now is the time to put that pretty dress on your Tilda! Or to give Edwin a handsome shirt! Whatever you can come up with we want you to have some fun with your pattern paper and your images.
Speaking of John Rzeznik, I almost got tickets to a Goo Goo Dolls concert. Almost. Can you believe that? My dad was going to let me go to a concert! Sadly, I can’t go because it is on a weekday, the week before the dreaded, horrible, over-priced, ugly, disgusting Advanced Placement tests (not that I have a biased opinion on these of anything…).
Here is a picture of Maddie awake. She has been very fussy this past week, and when she is awake she is usually crying if she isn't eating. I caught her in a rare moment of contentment here.
Harvest and Tiong King Sing
There’s a girl
Mournfully
I caught my reflection in the train window: in addition to the ugly blouse, I was indeed sporting a natty puce cardigan. He hadn’t meant to be hurtful, but I was mortified and instantly went into an ill-advised monologue about the arctic climate of my office — “If I die there, I won’t even have to pay for my own cryogenic freezing chamber,” I said, stumbling on “cryogenic.”
I've been too busy lately to remember it was Remembrance Day, so this post is kind of late.
I’m pretty sure Barcis was a town out of a fairytale. It was built next to a breathtaking, smooth as glass blue-green lake. The lake had a small layer of fog resting on it and swans floated across its serene waters. We held hands as we walked along the lake-side path, talking about nothing at all but everything at the same time. It just felt right to be by his side. Talking to him and loving him was effortless for me. There was nowhere else in the world I would rather have been, than with him. Whether it was in this fairytale swan-lake town nestled in the Alps, or in brown and boring Mountain Home Air Force Base, Idaho. I knew I wanted to be with him wherever he may go… I was beginning to picture a life with him. Could he be “the one”? It sure felt like he was the one. We shared the same silly sense of humor, we valued family and God above all else, we never had a problem communicating and most importantly, he made me happy. I didn’t know if I would marry L, but the thought of it was the only thing on my mind as we drove back to Pordenone.
In the hands of skilled technicians and experienced radiologists, obtaining medically necessary studies remains safe. What may be needed is a realization by all involved that the more exposure we have the more risk we experience. For this reason, I will be giving my patients a radiation exposure history tracking card for their wallets. Each time they have a medical x- ray I will be asking them to record the date and type of procedure. This will include dental x-rays (0.005mSv or 1 day’s natural exposure level) and all other procedures so we can track annual exposure and consider alternative diagnostic options in those with large exposure numbers.
Second Course: Seared Wahoo, Parsnip Puree, Oven Dried Roma Tomatoes ans Asparagus paired with Goat Toppler Maibock
1 biologists
Myth: Jihad is only defensive
Roads and Schools were closed for days, we were taken to work by the National Guard and we even had to have the snow shoveled off our roofs for fear the roof would collapse. It was quite memorable!!
“Sincerely, TL Fisher.”
Satay may stage served screen a spicy peanut relish engross, or peanut gravy, slivers of onions and cucumbers, and ketupat ( rice cakes ).
Baby kept his ears on for about 2 seconds.
No, he won't be mourned by many, just his children and his wife, for Bob lived a plain and ordinary sort of life.
Neil Innes: Guitar, Keyboards, Vocals
It was a shame when we demolished her little witch's cottage but soooo gingery. Yum!
It’s a common story by now: guy enters mid-life and is unfulfilled with corporate career. Chucks six figures and launches absurd dream: food on wheels. There you have it, a truck peddling Belgian waffles on a night when you’ve slurped down curry soup.
Standing in the shadow of the door.
In accordance with these developments, today’s women have soared to new heights, becoming active participants in realms previously closed to them – as halakhic advisers, as advocates in rabbinical courts, and even as heads of batei midrash (houses of study).
Grayson set me back on my feet. His smile constricted my heart and confirmed my words were not just in my head.
The survey complements an independent Government-commissioned review of the impact of the smokefree law which found no significant decrease in the number of people visiting pubs or restaurants before or after the legislation.
“There’s still time to take this bill down. Read, learn, and then let your Congress-Critters know that, once again, We The Internet will not stand for these assaults on our rights.” Read more..
Then it happened.
LOTS, I mean really LOTS of bike riding. But, seriously, Sullivan would spend 24/7 on his bike if I let him.
Andrew Garfield stars as Parker, Emma Stone assumes the role of Gwen Stacy, while Rhys Ifans plays Dr. Curt Connors A.K.A. The Lizard.
Good morning sweet stampers on this fine lovely morning...hope you are all well!! Before I get on to this week's challenge, a big thank you to all who entered our challenge last week....you are all so talented!!
Too good to be true?
-salt and pepper
"Everything about him," says a character in one of Baring's novels, "gave one the impression of centuries and hidden stores of pent-up civilisation." In our uncivilized age, it is perhaps inevitable that Baring's star should have been overlooked. For as long as the light of civilization dwindles, so will the reputation of this most civilized of writers. Ultimately, however, his future position in the ranks of the great novelists of the 20th century is assured. As the permanent things reassert themselves, and as civilization rises from the ashes of burned-out nihilism, so the works of Maurice Baring will enjoy their own resurrection. The facile and the fashionable will fade, and the peripheral will pass away; but Baring, or at least the best of Baring, will remain.
If you can have the confidence to build your own PC, this will probably be the way you want to go (especially if you want to build a high-end one). Buying your own parts online and putting the PC together yourself will usually save you a few hundred dollars in the long run. Plus you’ll have it easily customized with whatever you wanted it to have.
Jill chuckles softly and said, "good."
and an extra set of hands for a few days!
Get up early, around 6:30AM, if I remember right. It wasn’t as cold as the night before. Actually it wasn’t as cold as I expected during this trip. Despite that I wisely forgot my bag liner, I didn’t feel very cold in my flimsy sleeping bag. Not sure if me wearing lots of closes had to do anything with it. So after quick breakfast we started up. Rita went ahead while I was packing. She was still walking funny from 2 days before.
Yes I know, I'm a tad past that magical 30 medal mark. I figured that since we're in between seasons and no one is actually competing I would take a few liberties.
“In fact, the results of a national study released in 1996 show that more than half of all African-American and Hispanic women in the United States are already above what is considered a healthy body weight. …
"Nail biting tension and a plot that just won't quit. The Right & the Real is a romance with attitude and a romp with heart." - Tim Wynne-Jones, award-winning author of The Uninvited and the critically acclaimed, Blink & Caution
2011. In the Aintree feature itself he ran disappointingly and was pulled up at the 29th. He began his preparation for this year’s race at Wincanton in early November, when fifth behind The Minack, before unseating Sam Twiston-Davies in the Betfred Becher Chase a month later. He has finished sixth, fifth and fourth on his three most recent starts – at Cheltenham on New Year’s Day, Warwick two weeks later and at Newbury on March 3, with the middle performance being easilt the best. Bred in Ireland by County Meath-based Peter Casey, Hello Bud was trained by his breeder when he made his debut in a bumper at Kilbeggan in May, 2003. Two more unplaced bumper efforts (when ridden by his trainer/breeder) followed, and a maiden hurdle run was no less successful before Hello Bud disappeared from the racing scene for two and a half years until reappearing in point-to-points in the spring of 2006. He soon made his mark, winning three in succession, and later tried hunter chasing and handicap chasing without success for Casey, until, in November, 2007, he had his debut in Britain from the yard of former trainer David Wintle and carrying the colours of current owner Seamus Murphy. Unplaced on that occasion in a handicap hurdle at Towcester, Hello Bud subsequently won three handicap chases for his new handler, and maintained the winning momentum after being transferred the short distance to Twiston-Davies following Wintle’s retirement at the end of the 2007/08 season. He won three more handicap chases before going to Ayr for his biggest success. If successful on April 14, Hello Bud would become the second oldest winner of the John Smith’s Grand National after 15-year-old Peter Simple who won in 1853. Race Record: Starts: 32; Wins: 8; 2nd: -; 3rd: 2; Win & Place Prize Money: £253,589
Sewing plans:
They continue to make the most idiotic decisions possible. They get the freaks locked up. But they decide they wouldn’t be able to live with themselves if they killed them. Sure I would definitely be rolling around during sleepless nights thinking „Oh, my conscience is eating me alive, I killed these human eating psycho mutants, that killed my friends.” They leave a guy to guard them, but apparently it is incredibly easy to fall asleep when you’re sitting right in front of a cell full of crazy, disfigured people full of your dead friend.
Avocado: 2 ripe
3. Filters. If the light is bright, you may not be able to slow down the shutter speed to 1/2 second or more. So, what to do? You can screw on a neutral density filter or a polarizing filter to let in less light. Cool, huh? For this photo, I used a polarizing filter because I left the neutral density filters at home. Using a combination of the polarizing filter and a really small aperture allowed me to get a shutter speed as slow as 1/6 seconds.
We live in an OWS/Occupy Movement versus Tea Party world. And we can see that a growing number of people in America and around the world are getting ready to worship the beast.
Wednesday: Pages 108-152
Such an easy and relaxed party, and since most everything was disposable, clean-up was a snap! Although I am glad to have a full year before planning another one. Not to mention I can't bear the thought of her turning 7!!
Lexicographer Robert Burchfield summarises:
Cinque, a sophomore at Rose Hill and a third degree black belt, recently competed against athletes from over 100 colleges at the National Collegiate Taekwondo Championships, held at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.
Will Joy Christie / Skinship / 51
Coming back to West Bengal, it faces a number of other demands, like Greater Cooch Behar, Kosal and Kamtapur.
It'd be even better if you could do it partially drunk.
The Phoenix is a legendary mythical bird that appears in one form or another in the lore of multiple ancient cultures such as in Egyptian, Chinese, Persian, Greek, Roman and Phoenician tales to name a few. The phoenix at the end of one life cycle builds a nest that bursts into flame, consuming both the bird and nest in fire and reducing them to ashes. From these ashes a young phoenix or egg emerges, renewed and reborn to live once again. Considered benevolent, sacred, and magical, it was often depicted as a beautiful and powerful bird, a fire spirit, a free spirited being who was an allegorical or symbolic embodiment of the concepts of beauty, virtue, triumph over adversity, resurrection, rebirth, immortality and renewal. The word ‘Phoenix’ is derived from the Greek word for ‘red’, which also associates it with the Sun.
Lauren Willig, THE GARDEN INTRIGUE
Then a few weeks later came my encounter with Eating the Dinosaur. I figured it had an awesome title–I mean, who doesn’t want to talk about dinosaurs and I may be a vegetarian but sure, what the heck? Let’s talk about eating them–and it was by Chuck Klosterman, who I was still very much crushing on at that moment. I could not fathom any way possible for this book to disappointment. Boy, was I wrong. I’m not saying it was a bad book. The writing was still brilliantly snarky and satirical. It was a great look at pop culture. But it just didn’t affect me the same way Sex, Drugs, and Cocoa Puffs did. And that led to a lot of disappointment on my end. I am still standing by that someone with much more knowledge of the pop culture in Eating the Dinosaur would probably enjoy it as much as I did his first book I read. I think that’s my problem. I was familiar and well-educated on many of the topics in Sex, Drugs, and Cocoa Puffs or, at least, they were things that I could quickly form vaguely intelligent opinions on. So, I decided to give Klosterman another try…
Do you like my new top page?
And as always, here's an invite link to sign up for Stitch Fix if you're into the idea! Leave a link below if you've done a review since the last time! ;) I wanna see your goodies so I'll know what to ask for specifically next time! haha xo
Now I am much more conscious of what I eat and how much, and diligent about weighing myself (almost) every morning and responding to any weight gain. I eat more vegetables, more protein, and less carbs. I plan plan plan so that I will have healthy food choices at hand both at home and at work. I do spend more time than before on food planning and prep, but I’m willing to invest that time and effort in order to eat healthier, and to know what is in the food I’m eating (unlike with food prepared by someone else, such as at a restaurant). I’ve introduced more activity and exercise into my life, also important. And I’m just more motivated – do NOT want to return to my pre-Optifast state.
Luke and Beth live in Nashville. He's a country songwriter! He's had a few #1 songs, including a few for Carrie Underwood. In fact, her latest song, Undo It, he co-wrote - and it just went #1 this week! He lives a busy, successful life in Nashville, but when we get him back home, it's as if he never left. He's as down to earth as they come and his new wife is just as wonderful.
(Furthermore, would you add this proviso: that the books must be obviously read and enjoyed . . . and not merely decorative?)
Realizing that I was never going to find the magical lower-level-anything to hack out (seriously, would have accepted a dressage, H/J, barrel racing... whatever), I finally decided to give up on the amateur catch riding and get my own beast where I could at least account for the bad behavior myself.
Roseate Spoonbill
The next major change is to the Gloria. Most of the changes are innocuous enough, but there's one at the beginning of the prayer that seems bizarre to me. The familiar "and peace to his people on earth" is changed to "on earth peace to people of good will." Not only is the latter far more awkward in English, but there's also a problematic sentiment implicit in the new phrase. Why are we only praying that people "of good will" receive peace? This seems to say that people who are without "good will" are not deserving of peace.
Frankly, I’d rather organize the linen closet, but I did that last week. Or polish my shoes. Or go to a movie. Or make soup.
Tap of the fly
Hello there, friends! Long time, huh? It's been an interesting few months here at the Fischer house. The job is going well, and the family is fine. We have been thrown a bit of an unexpected curve ball, but more on that later... :)
And…….
with a live concert by Devil Music Ensemble
allies.
the wife, Funke, asking her to lead
I was so concerned about the humidity. I told pretty much everyone about my fears. Well they turned out to be deserved. I will no longer drink sugary sports drink on the course. I only had a few cups of Gatorade. I tried to avoid it but knew I needed to replenish salt. My nutrition plan worked out pretty well with drinking two cups of water at each station. I don’t think I will adjust the water intake rather the type of electrolytes I receive.
On the one side you write a heading that says, Angel. On the other side you write Gargoyle.
Have a good Sunday, everyone!
One is thus presented a choice:
Edited to add: Thanks to all for the comments and to Mom for calling me up personally. You are all right (well except for that last "Anonymous" one who is too chicken to give a name and too shallow to know what this blog is about.) I think most of this was angst over my current personal situation with the Captain and some things I have come to realize, along with the incredible and overwhelming love I have for the kids and the desire to be what they need me to be that is best for them. As it turns out, Son and I had an AWESOME weekend, a great day Sunday, and he has been in and out a lot thus far over break. He went with me Tuesday to pick up Daughter. He is an amazing child. I know he does love me. I underestimated him, too, about Thanksgiving. He said to me the other night, "I want to spend some time here because I'll be with Dad on Thanksgiving." My Dear, Sweet Boy. Amazing.
De bloemetjes zijn van Petaloo en de roosjes weer van Wild Orchid Crafts. Op de roosjes en het schortje heb ik Stickels, Stardust gedaan.
When the distribution of Communion is over, the Priest or a Deacon or an acolyte purifies the paten over the chalice and also the chalice itself.
And I do care about my NaNo project (the third book of The Non-Agency, 'Don't Fear the Reaper'), even given how much I screwed up the second book in the trilogy by rushing it. I have a better idea of where I'm going with this one, it's a simpler story, and it's got the grand climax at the end to look forward to (and boy, am I looking forward to it).
A closer look at the smaller contents. Now, I'm not going to give away how I plan to use these things, but expect an update blog post with completed creation before March!
Forever in His arms,
I read RecoveringAnorexic’s post about an episode of Canadian Intervention that she watched about a girl named Cassandra who was bulimic. So I decided to watch the video.
I dim my song
When I first put these people, I was so surprised! They squeeze you, hold you, they make your legs look slim. Suction thigh packaging seems to suck your thighs to make them look thinner, smoother, if this is even possible, but they do so. The contour of the waist band, it has around it some minor filling, which is very flexible, so it is ideal for sculpture perfect buttocks sitting. The best part of the back of the pocket. There is some padding in which they are different shapes and cut normal James jeans pocket, they appear higher positioning is different, they really make your butt look like stretched out. I like it! They gave the illusion of PERT docking.
So it seems that we are headed back into underdeveloped status. Our troops will eventually have to come home, and there won’t be much here for them to come home to. We’ll keep shipping our timber to China to come back as IKEA furniture, shipping our iron ore from Mesabi to come back as Honda Accords, and gradually we won’t be able to afford all these nice things on our welfare checks, and then the welfare checks will start bouncing. Then we'll get around on pedicabs.
“The Bible is very easy to understand. But we Christians are a bunch of scheming swindlers. We pretend to be unable to understand it because we know very well that the minute we understand, we are obliged to act accordingly…Yes, it is even dreadful to be alone with the New Testament”
Yes, I'm really not surprised. For some time now, I have to remember to put my camera beyond his reach whenever I put it down. Too many times, I've looked over and seen him walking around with my D-7000, trying to figure out the buttons.
King: Woman, were you spoken to?
Italian Sub Salad
It's the day I leave Las Vegas, and now I wish I was just arriving. The perfect, identical suburbs, the wide open barren places and the crazy confabulation of "entertainment" in this town leave me feeling lonely.
I guess you could say that when I visit Woodstock (New York that is) which I recently did with my wife and daughter— I feel young and old like I’m in two different places or time periods at the same time. There are some young people there who look like what we looked like in the 60’s who wished they were in the 60’s and a lot of old hippies who in many ways still are.
Apply generously on the patches and blemish area of the skin. This helps to remove skin blemishes if used regularly.
Part fugitive, part hero, fifteen-year-old Nya is barely staying ahead of the Duke of Baseer’s trackers. Wanted for a crime she didn’t mean to commit, she risks capture to protect every Taker she can find, determined to prevent the Duke from using them in his fiendish experiments. But resolve isn’t enough to protect any of them, and Nya soon realizes that the only way to keep them all out of the Duke’s clutches is to flee Geveg. Unfortunately, the Duke’s best tracker has other ideas.
Those people on the night shift have been using our creamer again.
GEORGE TOWN – The DAP-led Penang government proposal to give cash aid of RM100 for each newborn baby has been described as vote buying for the general election.
* A dedicated folk-style, freestyle, or Greco wrestler is automatically known as a brolic because of the physically demanding schedule they endure.
Stewart Jones, our best left-handed pitcher, throws a pitch that hits the inside corner for… STRIKE THREE. We head into extra innings.
Almond Ear Wire Tutorial:
Thoughtful to the extreme, you are often obsessed with perfection and the rules governing your own personal interests. Your world is black and white. You love to work within a logical system, such as language, computer programming, or mathematics. Manipulating a system that can be completely understood is a distinct pleasure to you, because of your confidence in the underlying veracity of your belief system. Because of your appreciation for logic and order, those who speak or think in a sloppy manner are apt to generate more than their share of wrath. Although very amiable, you are not drawn to friendships out of a sense of personal need. You are just as happy by yourself with a good book or puzzle. Because you are so involved with thought, you will on occasion have difficulty dealing with the day-to-day problems of a normal life. Taking out the trash, doing the dishes, these are often left until the last possible moment, if at all.
The Pinnacle mannequin factory and showroom.
As news of the errors came to light, prominent climatologists the world offered their resignations, many suffering public ridicule. Glaciologists, who had gone out on a limb in suggesting that the accelerated melting of glaciers could impact the water supply of billions of the world’s people, acknowledged that, in fact, they could probably just buy some Evian or something. Apologising profusely, a number of oceanographers who had once been concerned about ocean acidification, noted that the outlet of a sulfuric acid factory was probably not a great place to measure these things.
“Flesh and blood” does generally refer simply to humans. But in no other instance does Paul parallel “flesh and blood” with “neither does corruption inherit incorruption.” So I’m not sure how helpful these other usages are when none of these parallel Paul’s usage here. It is true “flesh and blood” does not inherit the kingdom, but incorruption does. Immortality does.
Let's say goodbye to last day of October & welcome November!
Dear friends and followers, every day I receive emails from readers, most of them professionals, from all over the world, asking me where to find Belgian companies, specialized in decoration and interior design. As I really have not the time to answer all of your emails, I decided to post about the Belgian companies of which I might think they are worth talking about and of which I am sure they represent our Belgian interior design style.
2. John Zorn "Prelude 4: Diatesseron" 4:29
After too many dud scones, I've tweaked my scone and cappuccino tradition. I bake a large batch of scones, then thaw one for each car ride, guaranteeing a delicious scone each time. I'm tempted to bring a tub of clotted cream and jam, although I'm sure my steering wheel will end up slicked with grease and my pants spotted with jam.
“Ma! Where have you been? I’ve been looking all over for you.”
Jane Applegate (CEO and President of Applegate Group) – She is a small business author, speaker and consultant specializing in helping big and small companies market and promote their products and services. The Applegate Group Inc. writes and produces video for websites, trade shows and events. It has worked with: Bloomberg Television, Cox Communications, the New York Times and Merrill Lynch.
Borat
I could do it all myself and usually I do because of these exact things. But why? Why do I have to do three people's jobs on top of my own?
It's totally surreal and visually disorienting with some great shocks. The psychedelic soundtrack is amazing and the incredibly tacky wallpaper in the spooky old school is one of the scariest parts of the movie. LOL
The smell from the honeysuckle and rambling roses was divine - it hit me like a blast, I had never really noticed it before. I need to train it up and around the archway but I dont see that as a problem really. I have planted a Clematis on the other side and hope this one actually starts to grow - there is something about this side of the arch - no matter how many Clematis I plant, they all seem to wither and die!
(and when I mean slight, I mean slight. I dont mean how the drugstore brands say 'slight' and then youre running to the sink to wash FIRE off your skin)
Nature holds you every day.
Punch: MS Heart Lace
Since we're halfway to Month 2, I should probably add Blake's 1 month stats from his wellness checkup. Sam and I have pretty much been sick since Blake turned 1 month- hence my blogging hiatus.That could be a whole other blog post on its own. :)
I always feel good after a good work-out at the gym. The whole body feels really energised! Must be the warm muscles & the blood pumping! Very often, the challenge is to make the time to go to the gym & ignore the excuses not to head there. It always feels good too after spending time with friends & doing what we love doing; talking, laughing, eating & baking! That's what I did with my friends, Salina & Nura, last week. We talked, laughed, ate, baked & ate again!
It is important to note that all of these scenarios represent explicit political goals for different groups located at different points on the political spectrum. Perversely, disastrous climate change scenarios actually offer certain societal forces a sense of future relief—however misguided or short-term that relief may be.
Oh FNL – I love you, I really, really do love you. I want to believe you are all real people living in Dillon, Texas having struggles and triumphs and heartbreaks and joys. All while being really, really pretty.
And then called in the police.
have done a far better job of spreading their message,
NAILS: Finesmith ~ DRAAKJE Nails
After I saw the film, I noticed an online discussion about one specific issue. The character of Loki uses an antiquated expletive in the scene with Black Widow where he refers to her as a “Mewling Quim”. I really don’t know what to think of this. It has been argued by the critic Mark Kermode (who surprisingly rates the film quite well). I didn’t notice this or know about this word when I saw the film, however it seems of note that a small number of (adult) viewers discovered this slight. This term requires a bit of context and apparently has regional significance. I was listening to a podcast last week on Radio 4 by Will Self who talked about the philistine trend of critiquing books for using words that are considered verbose or that many readers are not familiar with. The use of unusual or difficult language should be applauded, although there is some real power to the insult that Loki says which distinctly symbolically feminises Black Widow as a way of undermining her.
Our family would always devour it! I remember her baking lots and freezing some so there'd always be a quick dessert fix to enjoy. But if you could land a fresh piece or 5 on the day it was baked, NOTHING else mattered.
Finally, asked about tips for writing, she made it clear that she didn't really feel you can teach writing, because each time you embark on a book you don't really know how to do it, or how it's going to turn out. It's something unseen or dim, a beast that you have to struggle with alone..
-Hilary Muckleroy
Overhead lights aren’t desirable as they create ugly shadows on the face. If they are all you have you may be able to balance them with a reflector.
7:30am: Two Tars
I was delighted to be typing again, and was once more invested in my characters and their drama. Glorious.
“The Royal Society’s position is that creationism has no scientific basis and should not be part of the science curriculum However, if a young person raises creationism in a science class, teachers should be in a position to explain why evolution is a sound scientific theory and why creationism is not, in any way, scientific.”
After documentaries about visionary futurology, the 60′s Black Panther Party and technological progress VS sustainability, it is now time to discuss the impact of the discovery of LSD on 60+ years of counter-culture (and military as much as medical research).
First they reprimanded the largest group of U.S. nuns, who by the way, tend to be way more popular than either priests or nuns among American Catholics.
My grandmother was born in Dubrovnik. It was 1900, long before the ethnic tensions bubbled over and tore the country apart. Her parents moved to New York City, where her father, who was half Irish, practiced medicine. But Dr. Mooney and his Slavic wife were homesick. They sought other Yugoslavs, others with whom they could speak their language and relax their struggles to become American. They found other immigrants from their world in a creekside Hudson Valley working town a couple of hours north of New York by train. They bought a little farmhouse down the road from the Yugoslav lady who grew grapes and happily returned each summer to remember where they'd come from.
Welcome to England on a wonderful May Bankholiday ..of course its raining but then again it always rains on bank holidays we are used to it...Our sea fronts will be full of families trudging up and down and yes we brits take umbrellas and sit on the beach we are a stubborn lot nothing will stop us not even the rain lol.
This digi stamp from DSB is called "Henry Driving" and was colored with Copic markers on both cards. I specifically shopped my local scrapbook store for the just-right papers to go with the driving theme. On this card the papers are from Doodlebug Designs' "Boys Only" collection.
January O'Neil. The title is named after an island in Salem Harbor. The poems deal with my divorce--two people clashing, and other themes.
It had been a long driving day, 475 miles, and we were tired when we got to the Toad River park. Lynda went inside to register and, lo and behold,she comes back out with Jim and Merrill Dick - how nice it was to run into them! We got settled into our site and then met them in the little restaurant for dinner.
Israel = horrid customer service but generally efficient.
Roll out each ball into a disc, not as thin as a chapati, and keep ready.
While having Interstitial Cystitis, thought to be an autoimmune disorder of sorts, does not carry the severity of someone who’s just undergone an organ transplant and is loaded down with immune suppressant drugs, I can assure you, many of us suffer a great deal when some thoughtless individual sneezes near us, or sends a child to school sick, thus passing along the infection to our own children, and ultimately us. We, the unseen masses of men, women, and children with broken pee machines, are usually crippled by a bladder flare.
As all this madness does unfold
If you think about it, there are many possible sources your players could get this information from. They might read it in the newspaper archives, they might learn it from one of Pr.Smiths students, or one of the his co-workers at the university, or they might find a letter in Pr. Smiths desk, a picture on his wall. It's not important where they will get the information from. So make it easy for your players. Reward their ideas by giving them the clues they need to advance the story wherever they cared to look.
Do you have big things planned for Valentine's Day in your classroom? I am glad that I do not have to plan a party for my students, but know that they are going to be all kinds of excited for the day of love!
Anyhow, I’ve been reading through those very first entries in particular. It wasn’t even really a journal at that point so much as a notebook I used to fill up with all kinds of stuff – drawings, my early half-assed attempts at poems, stories about things that had happened to me or that I just plain invented… I guess Greatmother Geyah and my mother both thought I had this creative side, so they figured they’d give me some notebooks to try to encourage me.
65. Knows what the word pseudomonus means. I wish I didn't!!
For me, writing is a form of worship. I don’t write to impress you, the reader. I don’t write to bring attention to me, the author. Whether it’s through humour for the sake of humour or a serious life lesson, the words on the page must ultimately draw people to Jesus. Otherwise, every word penned is meaningless.
WORST DIRECTOR
To a much lesser degree, I identify with Cornelius. Some have claimed he is a persecuted skeptic. But it is never really made clear whether he whether he follows the sacred scrolls because he believes in the religion or if he does so out of a desire to keep his job as an academic. He is obviously a truth seeker in the sciences, but it is only a stereotype that those holding religious views are blocking scientific progress.
June 1, 2011 — The first officers to arrive at Anthony home on July 16, 2008 say they did not smell human decomposition in Casey’s car and admit they did not search the other two family cars. They testify about Casey going to Universal Orlando Resort with Casey that day, where she confessed she no longer worked there and did not have a nanny named Zenaida Fernandez Gonzalez.
These results, while impressive and proof of the fact there may be a significant market for newspaper pay walls; it will only be when we have a year’s worth of data to compare to determine if digital subscribers are growing. Because of that it will be at least November when the September reporting period results are published and more likely next May before the stickiness of these results become clear.
Grits supports comprehensive immigration reform and a path to citizenship for two simple reasons: I oppose mass incarceration and support expanded immigration to boost the long-term stability of the economy. Further, it's smarter to choose to expand legal immigration thoughtfully than to live in some denial fantasy and pretend US labor demands haven't been the driving factor behind illegal immigration trends.
2. Open to a random page
I hope the following 10 reasons are
Now that I've drawn the distinction between natural and 'circumstantial' rivalries, let's apply this notion to conference realignment. More specifically, let's consider a few different scenarios for the SEC moving forward as a mega-conference. SEC elitists, like my wife, don't want to see any schools added to the juggernaut. This "no one else is good enough" stance is noble although unfeasible. Besides, you don't have to look beyond Vandy, Kentucky and Ole Miss to realize that not every school in the conference has a perennial Top 25 football program. I, on the other hand, am taking this expansion talk in stride. I'm aware of the power that comes with adding major TV markets, perennial powers and new traditions.
I hope you all played nice while I was gone. It's good to be back.
Pakistan’s apparent involvement in a double-game of this scale could have major geopolitical implications and could even provoke US counter-measures. However, the powerful role of the ISI, and parts of the Pakistani military, suggests that progress against the Afghan insurgency, or towards political engagement, requires their support. The only sure way to secure such cooperation is to address the fundamental causes of Pakistan’s insecurity, especially its latent and enduring conflict with India.
There are some interesting reversals, though. Stu mentioned in his comments at the bottom of my old blog that, the first time he met Shakin’ Stevens, he thought the Welsh singer was grumpy and rude. But, when he worked with him again, says Stu: “I mentioned that he’d been an obnoxious prick on our previous meeting, we established the date of the occasion in question and Shakey then recounted the rather horrible personal events that had led up to that day in Edinburgh when I’d met him and I totally understood why he wasn’t very chummy or affable under the circumstances.”
GINGRICH: Does it contemplate that some day we could have a rocket? My point in the speech I made yesterday, which is on CSPAN and I’d love to have all of you look at it. It’s based on having looked at space issues since the late 1950′s when missiles and rockets was a separate magazine. And working with NASA and others. I believe by the use of prizes, by the use of incentives, by opening up the space port so that it’s available on a ready basis for commercial fight, by using commonsense for example the Atlas-V could easily be fixed into a man capable vehicle so you didn’t have to rely on — on a Russian launch or a Chinese launch.
Anyhoo, on the first trip back a couple of weeks ago, I took the Bub with me. Today, my friend Traci from Beneath My Heart and I met up to spend the day together. We were just two crayzay Moms, shopping, eating and drinking sodas. (I gave myself a “soda pass” for the day.) ;)
Lur?s have becom? hot! They not only have hooks to catch o?r f?sh, b?t they have the hook? to dr?g us down e?ch aisle. We are al? in sear?h of f?nding th?t one special, you a?l know wh?t I mean… this is the on?, I can f?el it, I know its going to catch fish, L?re!
We looked around the section of sweets/goodies before ordering our food. He walked by and picked up a bag of Walker’s which is basically the English version of Lays.
Now, as a bonus for sitting through all that, and in the spirit of Radmobile that inspired this post in the first place, here are some covers of actual comic books I scanned out of a book for ya. No, I haven't ever actually seen or read any of 'em, but an old T-shirt company called Mutilation Graphics used to sell a Leather Nun shirt I was really tempted to buy back in the 80's. You'll have to click Teen Age Romances to find out what's so funny about it.
So I haven't had much energy or time to do a lot of craft projects recently. I have however been spending way more time on Pinterest than should be humanly possible. haha
pencils, and books. That's what I now keep near.. but a couple of my favorites are the Cintiq
I am Puss in Boots
Three weeks in a serviced apartment is not how I wanted to spend my holidays (or our money) but there is an indoor pool, I can walk to the shops, restaurants and cinemas and we have swimming lessons most days so I'm sure we'll keep busy and count down the days. The only downside is they can't give us a carpark during the daytimes so if I leave for the day they'll only give me a carpark at night. Again, cranky about it but accepted it.
El Cajon, California – March 22, 2001: 18-year-old Jason Hoffman, on the antidepressants Celexa and Effexor, opened fire on his classmates, wounding three students and two teachers at Granite Hills High School.
It was nighttime, and I did not like facing the idea of going to work the next morning. My job starts at 8am and lasts all day. It actually may have been awhile ago, longer than just a week or so, because I can't remember the details of it. All I remember is being sleepy, grumpy, and not wanting the morning to come. So out of the need for that adrenaline rush, I started play-slapping College Guy. It was really wherever I could reach at the moment, and it really wasn't all that hard, although a couple of the slaps may have stung. I don't know what I was thinking.. He would warn me to stop, and I would, but then I would do it again. These kind of things are sometimes like a bag of Doritos for me. Once I start, I can't stop until I play the whole thing through. He told me to go get my hairbrush. I refused. He told me if I did not he would get the cane and use it on me. I stalled, then when I could feel him about to get up to find the cane, I protested, "I'll go get the hairbrush!!!" He ended up giving me a good OTK spanking with my hairbrush and telling me I'd be caned the next day, when I wasn't so tired. "Cane me now." I pleaded. "Sorry, I think this is one of those things you need to think about and wait for." Ughghg.
Today’s interview is with Peter J. Williams, Warden ofTyndale House, Cambridge. He talks about his work and background in biblical languages, the reliability of the Gospels, internal vs. external evidences, the genre of the Gospels, the authorship of the Gospels, the Gospels as eyewitness testimony (link to talk here), historical methods past vs. present, oral culture and literacy in the first century, the dating of the Gospels (years vs. generations), approaching apparent contradictions, correcting substandard approaches to defending the Gospels, looking at morally difficult subjects in the Old Testament, tips for answering moral objections, advice on doing apologetics, and more.
ATC stands for Artist Trading Card. The operative word is trading. These cards are traded among artists, but never sold. When you trade, you write your information on the back of the card. There even are stamps (rubber/acrylic) made with all the needed information to put on the back of your
Raw Data:
Well, guess what? The drug I used to think made me sleepy now keeps me awake. I fell asleep, I woke up. I sniffed for a while, fell back asleep, woke up again. Sniffed, etc. All the way through the night.
I sincerely hope that the 100th year of struggle is the last one. I hope that Pres Zuma will announce that 2012 will now be the first year of achievement and striving for excellence! Let’s all hope that the ANC will now put skill, knowledge, experience and innovation on the top of their requirements list when new leaders are chosen. Please stop struggling and start performing!
2.) Regale you all with seven random facts about me
Their own death warrant.
He serves as a daily reminder to Heathcliff of what he COULD have had in a son — “I’d have loved the lad had he been someone else” — but I think he has another role to play as well.
PS- For all you old Falls Churchers...and specifically Cornerstoners, this is Lolly Taylor's recipe and let me just tell you, it is D-lish!! I think the sour cream makes it :)
The “Layaway Angels” can help spread a powerful message of love and gratitude across our nation. People helping people! Isn’t that what life is all about?
“This time would mark our what year anniversary for Merdeka?”
The increase in real GDP in the first quarter primarily reflected positive contributions from personal consumption expenditures, exports, private inventory investment, and residential fixed investment, the report said. These positives were partly offset by negative contributions from federal government spending, nonresidential fixed investment, and state and local government spending.
That final push up the Bright Angel Trail, from Indian Gardens to the trail-head, was the hardest stretch I've ever had to deal with, emotionally ready for it all to be over, and physically unable to keep a rhythm without frequent rest stops along the way. I was glad that I was still with Jess, who set a good pace up the hill and even had us running the final 50 or so yards.
the house is cold. there is no noise.
It is not necessarily true that a picture is worth a thousand words. It takes only a few words, if they are the right words, to create vivid portraits. The secret is to choose significant details — details that mean something, that promote the story, that evoke emotion — rather than to write long passages of trivia. By writing to the extremes (the extremities, I mean) we can bring our characters to life in a new way.
results: for not having to put much effort in "baking," this skinny muffin is a quick and easy healthy snack for the lady or lad on the go. as for taste, it's actually pretty good! somewhat dry, yes, but nothing a little almond butter can't fix. next time i'm adding applesauce to the mix (dave's idea) for moisture. to learn more about this recipe, check out jorge cruise's energy boosting recipes at doctoroz.com.
Let's find good, loving, forever homes for these children.
1 hide
Today is the day that I blog again.
I know, I know, "But Walt had a mustache!"
3. I was very surprised. Usually he’s getting goose bumps and runs for cover when I mention the S-word.
Little did I know... what when I had this blow up, Mike was already formulating a plan to propose to me that summer, at the beach, with all my friends in tow. He started hatching the scheme long before my break down and I had no idea. The plans for the elaborate beach vacation fell through, we were still going to the beach in July but a force of nature changed his mind about when and how he would propose....
drink if you have, from
eat warm or cooled. YUMMMMMMMMMM.
This night will live in my memory not for just the band's performance, but for a very enjoyable post-show outing that was facilitated by several very cool people. Laura, Lief, and especially John, thank you so much.
“Since coming to power in February 2006 the Harper government has refused to deal with the Canadian Arab Federation and the Canadian Islamic Congress, the two main national organizations representing Arab and Muslim Canadians, because they advocate for Palestinian rights.”
**Anthony's story: received text message from *B with my picture, figured it was a girl he knew. Didn't check the voicemail on his phone because he thought another friend had left it, so he had no clue we were going on a blind date that Saturday. He added me on Myspace thinking I was some random girl and "what the heck". It wasn't until Friday he ran into *G who mentioned being excited to meet some sorority girls that he put it all together that he was going on a date with me the next day**
I know that's the received wisdom, but I'm not buying it, and I'm tired of the stereotypes.
5-point harness
I have finally found a program that works for me on all levels, so I decided to stop publishing my free pdf patterns for a little while as I would like to offer much better quality of patterns. I would also like to learn more about global fit approach, so my patterns could be used by more people, I am also planning to offer my designs as made-to-measure printable patterns, how does that sound? Sound like a plan to me, at the end of the day, everything should have a positive direction towards success.
My cinematographer, Lucas Boutilier who will be absent from tomorrow’s shoot, asked me a question today. “Are you excited?” I answered with my usual response to this usual question: “No, I’m stressed. The zen of filmmaking hits me the moment I say the first action.” This, ladies & gentlemen, is what keeps me sane and continuously yearning for that day of shooting.
Even though "Got It Made in the Shade," "Give Me Back My Job," and "I Take It on Home" might not respectively represent prime-period bluegrass legend Jimmy Martin and Sun Records veterans Carl Perkins and Charlie Rich, they still have much to recommend to them. Gospel doesn't get much better than Sister Rosetta Tharpe's "Nobdody's Fault but Mine," and the more recently-recorded instrumental "Matthew 7:7" by the Graceland McCollugh Tigers is moving in its own way as well. Not surprisingly, the prewar blues tracks, Skip James's influential tour de force "I'm So Glad" and Charley Jordan's superb "Keep It Clean," qualify as my favorite items on this collection, while cult musician Jim Dickinson demonstrates why he was held in such high regard by the Rolling Stones and many others on "Down in Mississippi." His steady producer's hand graces a fine piece of Memphis R&B, "Sho' Do," performed by Ollie Nightingale & the Hodges Brothers. Regarding the New Orleans funk nugget "Pungee," if you're not already acquainted with the Meters, don't come back here until you are. On the other hand, I'll cut some slack for those not familiar with blackface minstrel Emmet Miller. Granted, his voice is a bit of an acquired taste, but his interpretation of "St. Louis Blues" remains intriguing. And finally, Phineas Newborn, Jr. demonstrates why he might be one of the most unfairly neglected jazz pianists in history on the ivory-tinkling workout "Abbers Song."
Shit. Gotta get some preparation done before the Mayers arrive.
I love Winchester and I love apples. Even in the winter when there are no blossoms, there are many signs of apple production and export that makes this one of the largest markets in the nation and "the apple capital of the world." Photos from our winter vacation, February 2012
“It has been a great honour to have worked for Rangers Football Club. I only wish the circumstances could have been better. I would like to offer special thanks to Ally McCoist and Gordon Smith who have been tremendous throughout all of this.
With great effort I am curbing
to open any door;
I think I need not list the awkward moments when the phone rang in my life – it would be too revealing and embarrassing – but I just wish to draw your attention to the nuisance value of the gadget. (Some people that I know might have to list out the moments in their lives when it is not ringing. My dear friend Senthil, the poor TV Newsman is one of them.)
So there you have it ~ some of my initial research on indoor gardening. In follow up posts hopefully there will be photos of my own plants growing and thriving!
More peaceful
I love Tj! He is the absolute best thing that ever happened to me and I am so lucky to have him. He is so supportive of me in everything I want to do and I couldn't be more grateful. We have been married almost three months and life has been amazing.
Isaiah 2:8
3/4 cup chestnut puree
“And she’s a fortunate woman.”
Step 5 - Blend your colours together with your lighter skin tone (E50 here). Now for blush, you can either tip-to-tip or use the palette blending technique. I chose to scribble some R20 onto the bottom of my acetate since it was already on my desk and then picked up the colour with my E51 Marker. I chose the darker one because I wanted rosy cheeks - but I will often do it with the lighter skin tone (E50) - depends on the image you are using.
I also asked comic and actor Matt Roper (son of George Roper, who also appeared on The Comedians) if he had any memories of Frank Carson.
He talked quite a lot about discontent in a quiet sort of way—balancing the tendency to be always the observer, how to effect change, wanting to get past his antipathy to working at B.I.
You do not need to be a member of C'est Magnifique to participate in our sketch challenge. It is open to anyone! You are welcome to use any supplies you have, but if you are the winner and it is obvious that you used any one of our kits - the prize will be DOUBLED!!!
Good stories are about character’s failing, and not by them succeeding. It is about David Banner loosing control, and the aftermath of that loss of control. It is about Magneto failing to protect his own from normal humans. It is never about either succeeding to fulfil their cravings. Not until the end of the story, in the climax
I press the button
Rotten was wearing a Pink Floyd T-Shirt when he first met his
So compared to what he encountered back in the ‘70s, when he started Black Enterprise, “we’re making enormous progress in this country. … I never really, quite honestly, thought that we would see an African-American president in my lifetime. I was thrilled to be able to contribute to his campaign,” he said.
On this special day, the Red Sox invited every player and coach to play for the franchise and 200 of them took the offer and be part of what is the oldest and greatest ballpark in baseball history. It was a fun-filled day celebrating but what was even better was facing long time rival the New York Yankees whom we beat 7-6 in 11 innings.
The treasure contained inside the Martell trunk will be revealed on May 17th.
Living in the suburbs according to my mom, meant sizing yourself up against your neighbors...right down to what you wore when you did yard work. I remember so many times watching her look out the window with total disdain as my dad mowed our grass.
A REASONABLE RESPONSE TO A TOXIC SITUATION, IS TO HAVE A PERSONAL DETOXIFICATION PROGRAM TO BALANCE BODY pH AND TO REMOVE HEAVY METALS… ESPECIALLY FOR THE RADIOACTIVE METALS
My other half is in Singapore since last Sunday and I am grateful to be able to scrap when he is around. It was my first crafting session with him and he calmly watched tv when I was busy creating and snapping pics. I kept telling him do not disturb me, do not disturb me and he actually behaved ;) LOL.
Pain –Males, imagine the worst charlie horse you’ve ever had. Remember that feeling, good. Now place that feeling on the inside of your body. A place where you are unable to reach, to massage, to alleviate the pain. Now on top of that, put a little devil poking that charlie horse with his trident. Yea, that’s right, welcome to a women’s period.
Drought and deluge would be the buzz words for the remainder of this year. Already significantly large geographical regions have been inundated by flooding caused by extreme rain events and storms worldwide.
But Euro-Zone demand is set to drop this year as the debt crisis rolls on without any solution in sight and since the UK does more than 40% of its trade with the monetary union, a Euro-Zone slowdown will continue to effect UK trade.
This just in! Kris Aquino, who has visited www.president.gov.ph this morning has barred James Yap from accessing the interactive site of her brother. A defiant Yap is reportedly asking the court to grant him visitation rights.
I’m not sure this strategy is really working, but at least it’s fun.
I can feel your hands and your lips caressing, stroking and arousing me, softly, gently yet passionately. I shiver as your soft lips linger when pressed against my skin at the nape of my neck. As your hands wander to my breasts, they send chills racing deep within me. You hold each one with your hands, using your fingers to tease my nipples, they are heightened and hard. My body is now longing and begging you for more, yet you are so gentle with me.
Super 8 (very good)
Now, the young lady in question is not criminal--not even close. She isn't pregnant nor has she ever been. No drugs, no booze.
The second definition is “pertaining to being the only one of its kind or class, unique in kind.” This is the meaning that is implied in John 3:16. In fact, John is the only New Testament writer who uses this word in reference to Jesus (see John 1:14, 18; 3:16, 18; 1 John 4:9). John was primarily concerned with demonstrating that Jesus was the Son of God (John 20:31), and he uses this word to highlight Jesus as uniquely God’s Son—sharing the same divine nature as God—as opposed to believers who are God’s sons and daughters through faith.
The event was held at a high school cafeteria. While the leftover clothes were going to a local shelter, monetary donations were being collected for the high school’s debate team. Girl members of the team were there helping out and were also participating in the swap.
But he is actually turning 30 this year :0)
Andrew: Develop all aspects of your creativity.
your steady gaze
When they go on to tell the story of a 15 year old who became a prostitute at 13, they make it sound as if at 13 she made a decision to enter prostitution. Having worked in Belville area on multiple occasions, I have yet to meet a prostituted woman, adult or child, working in that area who was not controlled by a violent pimp. Some of the worst sex trafficking stories we have heard have come from Belville, where teenagers have been beaten and forced to sleep outside, forced to take tik, strip searched for their money, deprived of food, made to sleep in the same beds that they work in, and while they are working the streets, they are constantly watched by their pimps who carry guns. This way they know to never run away. Whatever this 15-year-old’s situation is now, the language used in this article only further perpetuates the idea that she made a choice to be in prostitution, and that she is really a difficult teenager who was sentenced to a juvenile facility. I doubt that is the full story and quite frankly think writing in that language does a disservice to the many underage girls who have been exploited on the streets of Belville and denied the help they need.
I have decided I need to be as constructive as possible during this 'sleep' time and get jobs done that I really can't do with little 'helpers' around.
sparkling water
Although right now we may see only the sorrow and tears of the night, God has planned a bright and beautiful morning full of joy. The Bible tells us this over and over:
You've gazed, at last, upon the sun,
This week, representatives for the group announced that the frontman would join the band for an appearance at the Sweden Rock Festival on June 10 and a headlining slot at the Download Festival in England on June 13.
An important, radical anthology of articles, poems, and stories in which Araba and Arab american feminists challenge the assumptions and practices of mainstream feminism.
Kiefer's dedication and love for this character always came through in his performance. What made Kiefer's performance so amazing was his ability to brilliantly play Jack as the in-your-face, at times brutal counter-terrorist agent but just as effectively he could also be a sweet, kind, gentle man with the people he cared most about.
What's the alternative? You can write articles free and submit them to sites like Ezine Articles--or publish them on your own blog or website. Or, you can go the old fashioned route and submit blindly to various publications via snail mail. All of these are effective ways to get started, if you're willing to work hard and be persistent.
However, this post did show up when it was supposed to elsewhere on the net. Specifically, over at This Song Starts a Craze, hosted my musical partner in crime Mike. I came to him with the idea of continuing our tradition of the two of us looking ahead at what the year had in store. He accepted and like warriors of old, we dusted off our keyboards and went to work. Below is the result of that effort.
The Labour Government that came to power after 1945 did not bring The New Jerusalem as expected; the universities had been opened-up to grammar school pupils, not just public school products. These were the followers of the New Left and the new culture of the time. It was the era of CND opposition to Nuclear Bombs.
The thing about people is... they get obsessive. We all have a need for diversion. Diversion doesn't mean we don't care. It just means we don't go crazy with grief and sadness.
This Time
People approaching the coffin drop in a coin of real money (I wondered if I should make a wish) and there is a coin between his lips---his wife had to wash her eyes before she gazed on him
And..hello..I have three children!
His show plays nothing but the best in modern Canadian music, hence the title, as it broadcasts out of New York State (Troy to be exact). It can be heard Saturday nights at 7 p.m. Eastern Time (North America) on Exit 97.7 WEXT. However it can also be streamed live, through their website, or using the TuneIn radio app on numerous different platforms (iOS, Android, Blackberry, etc).
Perhaps as a result, his tenure as mayor is marked by little of actual substance. His somewhat elitist views and political outsiderness left him stranded in a city where 'Whiggery' often equated only to upper classes. His anti-Irish, anti-Democratic views were fighting against the wind. Later, by the 1830s, the power struggles between Whigs and Democrats would virtually wipe Hone's party from the city's political map.
Aren't we all bleeding, a little?
The reading will be this Monday, April 30 (which is a holiday here in Buenos Aires), at 6:00 p.m. Following my presentation will be Donigan Merritt reading from his novel, Blossom, at 7:00 p.m.
Remove batter from fridge, add the eau de vie or Armagnac, and whisk it lightly to reblend, then rap the pitcher against the counter to break the top bubbles. Pour batter slowly and gently into the pan, trying not to incorporate more air, and then drop in the prunes, distributing them evenly.
(about 1 teaspoon during cooking onions, 1 teaspoon when butternut squash and carrots added to the cooking onions. Add 1 teaspoon if needed when soup is finished cooking and still in the pot if more flavoring is needed.)
"We had not seen much commentary on the above Reasoned Orders so bring them to your attention. Queensland is particularly interesting in relation to process patents:
the first time maddux had on jeans his purdue shirt and his cubs hat & the second time he had a gap onsie with old style cars all over it. Neither outfits at all resembling something I would ever put a little girl in.
What a saved day! Hopefully I'll get to see CJ later and then this day will be awesome!
Day 3, I realized the need for more bonnets for the youth trek. This was a Relief Society service we had been wanting to undertake all year, but was hard to anticipate the need (how many and such). I knew I needed to learn how and help with the efforts....many sisters got involved and were willing. I was thankful to receive a lesson from a sister I visit teach. This allowed me to make a couple bonnets for the Youth Trek and a couple for my own daughters dress-up and play.
“It was warm and clear out there, but the water was threaded with dark glints of rust and an overall pallor of gray, a suggestion of something growing dark in the depths, massing.”
03 - When The Night Is Gone.
One can think of these three observations as three hurdles or three preconditions to acting sustainably. First, one must sincerely believe, as a matter of faith, that one’s actions in the universe matter deeply and inescapably. Second, one must know oneself as a complex being in order to not only adapt one’s mind but to adapt one’s ways. Third, one must have a standard by which to judge one’s own actions, a standard by which to choose one way of being over another.
May 2, 2012: Episode 2 – A Thing That Will Happen. Hosts Aaron and The Doctor talk about sports. Aaron & the Doctor are 2 sports afficianados exiled in the steel city, overwhelmed by the black and gold.
My Warmest Regards,
So now spring has sprung. So did one tulip. ONE.
Peter Jensen is a Danish-born, London-based mens and womenswear designer. Jensen's designs are known for being inventive, playful, colourful and well-made. In terms of inspiration, his work is characterised by a unique mixture of popular culture references and often makes reference to infamous or cult figures. Jensen's women's wear collections are consistently inspired by and named after a female Muse - though Jensen avoids obvious style icons, instead homing-in on popular culture's more marginal or complex females, who are as likely to be eccentric, wanton or even criminal, as they are heroic or overtly chic. As the designer has confirmed, "I like to base my collections on strong-headed women." (The Independent).
This is the interior of the dollhouse we built…it finally went home today. I hope the girls enjoy it!
Egged on by some school friends, W.B. can spend hours discussing nothing but the various Pokemon, their powers, what they "evolve" into, and their fighting skills. Did I say hours? I meant days.
Even the shapes of the letters forming the word “right” are just shapes. Each letter is just a shape. The G and the H do not even have a sound in that word, yet without those silent letters, “rit” is just not spelling it “write.”
And these are the leaders to save us…???
If I told you that I have an undergraduate degree from an Ivy League school, a doctorate from another top American university, and once worked on Capitol Hill, would that make you interested in reading my blog? I don't think so. (And yes, those really are my credentials.)
“My lead team would sneak into the mansion with me while the support teams cover the outside of the mansion & surround it, my lead team would quietly take out the few guards in the mansion, we would let some of the support team into the mansion & try to seal the doors, we would spread out & start killing the Montague Family, if any of the Montague Family went outside they would be shot by snipers and/or the rest of the support teams who surrounded the mansion, after killing the Montague Family we would unseal the doors so that the clean up team could work, we would keep the area blocked off from anyone until everything is cleaned up, and then we would leave.”
Horse: 1) A tapir or some other nocturnal, water-dwelling, soft-footed creature that could conceivably have been large enough to pull chariots, or 2) miniature ceremonial animal effigies carried on the king’s wheel-less sledge (see Chariot). Not an anachronism in the Book of Mormon.
Think about it. You will amount to nothing if you appreciate someone who is a complete fake.
Pity. They're beautiful (and they made it rain fire on stage) but they don't stand a chance because nobody knows how to spell their country.
The route not taken.
For Breakfast - I ate oatmeal or an egg sandwich with Ezekiel bread
The folks who had organised the parking for visitors in such a way that, from 10 am to 4 pm, they would have to cruise around for up to 20 minutes looking for a space. The people with Big Hair and clipboards who’d installed a payment system so complex, the queues at each machine were 5-6 people long all day. Almost as long, in fact, as the queues in the various hospital shops and cafes.
It was one long milk run for Dell, not returning back to the Allied forces for “one year five days and 25 minutes.” Dell and his crew were shot down by a German ME-109. Of the ten crew members only Dell and the pilot made it out.
Elsewhere, Golden Dawn escorts the elderly who are wary of immigrants to bank ATMs, said spokesman Elias Panagiotaros.
Roman women called their souls ‘juno’ in honour of their Goddess Juno; the goddess of traditional rites of passage, marriage, transition, reassignment and other such things. To this day many people consider June; after Juno, to be the most favourable time to marry. I consider it the most favourable time to have my surgery. Just as summer unfolds and the gardens are at their best, the colours are rich and deep, the foliage green and the sky blue. Wherever I am it will be California time, pilgrim time, pioneer time. Another tradition scared to Juno is the Matronalia festival.
You do not need to precook the chicken. It will cook as it boils in the canner. I put 1 tsp of chicken bouillon in the bottom of each jar. This is not necessary but I was interested in having really good broth for chicken soup. I cut all the fat off my boneless, skinless thighs, and then put them into the jars. There is no need to add any liquid. You should not pack them down tightly but they cook down quite a bit during the canning process. Next time I will put more in than I did this time. Make sure that you leave an inch of head room though.
of a bedroom showed frayed veneer
Only when he has confessed his libelous and slanderous crimes to all those he persuaded to accept his report as ‘factual and honest’ ,will he be able to beg Israel’s forgiveness.
Solicitors and Barristers would not be required at this stage as there would be no disputes and therefore would not need to be perpetuated.
Sounds pretty great, right? We can guarantee that this is the best deal you’ll get all year long (and probably all next year long, too), so start making your selections on what you want to get and setting your alarms now, folks. Remember, if you have any questions on product or the sale, please give us a call at 480-947-2032 or e-mail at scottsdale@lovesac.com. You can even leave a comment on our blog and we’ll try to get back to you. We’ll do our best to help you during any business hours (and even some non business ones when the blog is concerned). Other than that, rest while you can and we’ll see you on Friday!
In puzzlement, I pondered the situation -- never taking my eyes from that towel in case my nemesis might use that moment of weakness to make good his escape. I reviewed all moves and counter-moves, on the lookout for times or means of escape that the spider may have seized during the course of our battle. I found none. At least none plausible enough to really investigate.
In my case, my dad called a teacher and the three pupils who were bullying me were spoken to, but not actually punished. I was so scared at the time. I thought the boys would give me a harder time for speaking up. What actually happened though was that they left me alone after that. One of them even apologised to me. I was able to enjoy my final year in school. Sadly, I’d spent the previous two years being very unhappy and I wish I’d spoken up sooner.
— 20 dogs die in fire: Westchester County officials unaware of Greenburgh breeder’s online business
We came up with the idea of doing one "focus" activity a day, along with the usual required Bible, math, spelling, and reading/English. This allows us some variety, as well as a bit of structure, so we don't always default to our favorite activities when there is extra time (such as art for Ladybug, games for Cowboy, or reading for Tex).
Another all-time favorite is BEAUTY AND THE BEAST. Again, I blame Disney. When I was little, I wanted to be Belle. Seriously! Before I even knew what acting or theatre was, I had a dress-up box with all kinds of props, from a plastic rose from the craft store to an old Dorothy costume, to a stuffed My Little Pony roped onto a broomstick. I would put together my own production of the Disney version of the tale, talking along with the audiotape I had of the film whenever "my" lines came up. Belle was a reader like me, she had imagination, and she was brunette. I loved her. I wanted to be her.
Here are a couple of photographs from the class, the first is the journal itself:
Everyone's gone 'like' button crazy.
A) Mr. and Mrs. John Doe (traditional)
First let me state that the Rambam(and just about all of the Rishonim) recognized that Chazal were affected in their outlook on many things by the cultures that were around them, as well as the harsh realities of the culture in which they lived. To whit the primary responsibility of Kibud Av V’Em(honoring one’s parents) fell to the sons. Let me be frank. In a subsistence agrarian society, honoring(which practically meant caring for) one’s parents did not mean visiting them in the nursing home and bringing them a glass of water. It meant breaking your back working in the fields and then, essentially giving a part of your paycheck(which was not much more than what you needed to live on) to your parents for support and sustenance.
I am really, really close to finishing a building project I've had plans to build since, well... forever. Before we knew Kylie was a girl, I knew I wanted to build a dollhouse bookshelf. I've finally gotten around to building it, and it has been the most challenging project I've build thus far. I almost quit but my husband wouldn't let me. More on that as soon as I finish- but for now a sneak peek... =)
Below is my recipe for vegan char siew using taukan as the main ingredient.
Don't Shoot, I'm a Man (new song)
It’s bad now but will get worse unless stopped, and I think I’ve seen exactly what the model school of the future will look like.
After the doctor left, they entered Junsu’s room. As they came in, they saw Junsu looking at the window.
Don't forget to also check out The Redhawk Network for postings!
The exercise of this gift permits the Holy Spirit to use us as His agents, through prayer, to ask for those things the Father desires to achieve in us and through us so that His will might be accomplished and His Kingdom might be manifested in this world.
Bill STEWART (Drums)
WHERE: Duryea Presbyterian Church - 362 Sterling Place (corner of Underhill Avenue), Prospect Heights, Brooklyn - (718)783-2451
As I was following along with today’s stage I thought, Man, Lance NEVER used to fall of the bike! But then I remembered 2003. That was the first year I actually watched the Tour, and it had to be the toughest of Lance’s Tour wins. Not knowing any better at the time, I thought that was the way all Tours were supposed to go.
When I look back on my goals for 2011, I see that #2 and #3 are pretty much the same as what I included last year. Aack! I think part of the problem is that I'm always revising something - the revisions never seem to stop. Oh well, that means I did accomplish one of my goals - writing more regularly.
American Indian Healing Arts Kavasch, E. Barrie, Baar, Karen 1999 USA: Bantam
Crafts and Me Stamps recently released this lovely digital image named Lady of the Stars designed by Sara Burrier. This beautiful fairy is ready to wrap something or someone in her glorious garland of stars.
To whom would I recommend this: I recommend it to fans of Janet Evanovich. Some like them, some don't.
After waiting for 5 months to get into an empty unit in Somers Town, 52 Phoenix Road is now open! Come and visit us and take part in a lively month of community-run activities!
Other than that, the girls get to watch a movie or two depending on how much car time they are awake for and I bring a bag of toys and books. I try to pick out some books that they haven't looked at as much lately and that have good pictures. I bring 5-10 of those and our road trip toys. For the toys, I highly recommend the travel version of the Aqua Doodle.
Bo-Bo Farms Free-Range Roasted Lemon Chicken With Horta
Like cattle, they would struggle with the tank and the "commanders", wielding sticks, would be around whipping prisoners like slaves whenever they felt like it or when the pace was too slow.
Happy crafting everyone and thanks for stopping by!
In December, I saw that a St Vincent de Paul was moving into the old World Market location in Western Hills. I’ve shed many a bitter tear that World Market has left Cincinnati, but if the trade off was an enormous thrift store, then I’m over it. I couldn’t wait for its opening this month.
If you’re going to dream, you have to close your eyes first. If you close your eyes, it’s not important how other people view you. Only when you close your eyes, will you meet the real you, not the one that everyone sees. The self that you meet when you have your eyes closed, I say this to myself. Don’t ever give up on your dreams. The reason for that is, a dream isn’t just for someone with talent, but for anyone who dreams. With the feeling of running into the rain with a shabby little umbrella. Now we are going to dream a big dream regardless of the talent.”
Key Players: Brian Conklin (13.9 ppg), Kwamain Mitchell (12.1 ppg), Cody Ellis (10.5 ppg), Dwayne Evans (8 ppg, 7.3 rpg)
For God is the King of all the earth;
CCNY 2010 National Photography Competition with juror James Casebere
This was the one time of year when we paid homage to Martin Luther King for standing up for civil rights. We admired Rosa Parks for staying at the front of the bus, and we were confused about if Malcolm X was good or not so good…. Oh, and let’s not forget how we bow down to Madame CJ Walker for inventing that straightening comb!
The microcosm reflects the macrocosm, so as our planet is undergoing fundamental shifts to restore balance, so are we. On a personal level, what this means is that the polarities within our Being are rising to the surface to be dealt with, acknowledged and integrated so that we may move into wholeness. Our shadows, what has been too painful to deal with, or the anger we’ve bottled up as a result, are all surfacing to be embraced. The shadows are coming to meet the light. Our separate, fragmented, unhealed parts are coming into focus to be healed so that wholeness can be restored.
Crystalo points to where the camera-chick is climbing into the driver’s seat of the van, “She does, my camera person seeme to have real;ly gotten into the spirit of your Clover County.”
Vitamin B: Vitamin B helps metabolize carbohydrates, but also helps with energy production. Feeling lethargic? Go for B.
Autumn is my most favorite time of the year ~ the colors, the smells, the feel in the air, the change in temperature, the pumpkins, apples, amd squash, the baking, the coziness, the beautiful falling leaves. We have some leaves falling, but mostly it’s the cute little squirrels throwing heavy pine cones out of our trees onto our deck and into our yard, rummaging through my container plants on the deck and front porch in search of a safe place to hide their pine nuts after they’ve torn a pine cone into millions of pieces and littered it and dirt everywhere, eating the violas, etc. Really though ~ I do love them and it’s all part of the natural cycle of life. I don’t mind sharing with them ~ they are really so cute as they sit in my pots munching away ~ after all, they do have to eat ~ and I do so love watching them…
3 teaspoons butter, divided
In 1988, Paul Keating, then Treasurer and Deputy Prime Minister of the Commonwealth of Australia, went to see his good mate, Bob Hawke, then Pime Minister of the same venerable Commonwealth. Paul wanted to remind Bob of the deal they'd made bfore the 1983 election to transfer the leadership of the ALP and the Prime Ministership from Bob to Paul. Bob told Paul he must have imagined it all. Deal? Never heard of it. Paul and Bob had a full and frank. Plenty of the latter. It came down to a simple choice for Bob: make a deal for real or face an immediate challenge from Paul. Bob agreed to a witnessed meeting at which they would agree the terms of the arrangement.
I’m really tired of trying hard to be friends with everyone. There was a day when I had so many groups of friends, there was never a night where I didn’t have something to do. I always imagined that my late twenties would be exactly like Sex and the City, except I didn’t want to date a lot of guys, I just wanted a group of girlfriends like Carrie, Samantha, Charlotte and Miranda.
I found it sad, touching and bittersweet.
I give this as a supplement by the spoonful to the children and myself in these weeks leading up to the change in season, I give it also as an immune booster. The berries are powerful antioxidants, full of vitamins A, B and C, as well as amino acids. For more info look here. I like to keep the syrup on hand all winter, and give it at the first sign of a cold or flu. When I have an abundant supply like now, and it is hot, like now, I also use it as juice, and serve it over ice in a mixture of half water half syrup.
That's where we're hoping you come in. IF you're in a BN in the coming days and you see UNRAVELING in the kids
Actually moving on will also be new plans.
and if i didn’t fill up i would be going nowhere and in trouble.
Always wanting, aching fade
Wednesday: Leftovers (this is our normal routine, cook twice...get a break)
For those who are at home taking care of their families while their soldiers are off to war ….
Gwen Buchanan Probably printmaking, or glass fusing.. Life isn't long enough.. I want to try them all.. I find all art forms and methods relate to each other.. and the way they interpret in each field inspires me.
Erik: Sometimes I read and think deep thoughts, other times I sit in our music room and play and sing songs that either exist or are existing within the moment. Sometimes I only use the piano to keep things real simple and basic so I don’t wander off and start “practicing” the guitar. I try to direct my being towards Him. I fluctuate to do my best at staying keen towards Him.
Secondly, Twitter can be one of the biggest contributors of traffic to the Website. With a username @PR_Couture, it has 27,379 followers (9,251 following). It tweets almost everyday about the contents that have posted on other social platform. These are feeds that informing people what events company have done or will do in a brief message form. What’s more, the company is diligent to respond to others in real-time. The company interacts with its target groups continuously and thanks them when it gets helped – and the targets are also vary on Twitter; from student who seek job to business partner.
We’re not perfect, men nor women can declare perfection in a world with flaws. It’s time to start acting our age, the party days come to an end eventually. Today is simply a good day to let some of the people around you know, “I see your immaturity.” For those that think that maturity is a fancy car, job or wearing heels, you have it twisted. Maturity is owning up to your actions and feelings face to face, not in a cowardly text or email. I’m not making this up, this is some real stuff many of you might agree with. If you’re making funny faces at the screen, perhaps you fit into this category of immature people. The older you get, the more embarrassed you should be to act in such a manner.
He is quite loving and cute most of the time. Last night, was his vet appointment/shots. Up on the scale he went, weighing in at 25 !@#$%^ LBS. 6 weeks ago h e was a sweet cuddlely 8 lbs. It is official…he will be HUGE!!!
In spite of what is almost a total absence of study controls in real numbers and in principle, these authors -- a changing cast, I might add -- performed a number of complex statistical analyses with findings that should be disallowed from any perspective because of an utter lack of power. It's inexcusable to report any findings from these kinds of analyses using a control with n = 3. They claim that their multiple measures, etc., validate their findings in spite of the fact that they have only THREE controls: "While, as a pilot study, the size (sic) of the study groups limits the strength of the conclusions that can be drawn, the use of statistical modeling and repeated measures contributed to the study’s power and increased the accuracy of the estimates." No. Take a look at figure 3 of the paper. Take a look at the error bars. Note the error bars for the "unexposed" group and consider that these represent error for THREE individual data points. One. Two. Three. That's all. Three monkeys, and their names are "Hear No Science," "Speak No Science," and "See No Science."
Oh help us not to be so easily moved, even by pain may we have much
Is Obama a Muslim? Does Obama hate Israel? Will Israel be attacked again? Will Iran nuke Israel? Has Maghreb and Middle Eastern turmoil flummoxed the White House? Why did Obama bow to Saudi Arabia’s king? Questions, questions, questions?
53. A book you didn’t expect to like but did?
Donald Fagen: piano, keyboards & vocals
Him: “Different.”
“Najib has definitely abandoned all pretences for reform or transformation. It’s back to the old realpolitik of race, religion and money,” PKR strategic director Rafizi Ramli told The Malaysian Insider.
*Pearls from Queen & Co.
1yd - Black Pearl Trim (4mm)
Willing, I am.
We are a part of society and hence, it is compulsory for me to be an active participant in the activities of the society. And this is one of the many things I was trying to avoid in the last many years.
Did you know that many people around the world are being transfigured or undergoing transformation at the present time? You don’t have to go to Palestine to see them. They are right around you. They are in fact you and your fellow believers. Paul wrote of all believers in 2Cor 3:18 And we all, with unveiled face, beholding the glory of the Lord, are being transformed into the same image from one degree of glory to another. For this comes from the Lord who is the Spirit. “Being transformed” is the very same word used of the transfiguration of Jesus. What God did in Jesus He does in us. Our part is
last week, i promised some more shots of the restaurant project i've been working on...here they are! i'm actually still doing a little work there, but here is some of the other stuff i have done. the restaurant used to be eno (for you atlantans), near the fox, and they totally reinvented it, and now it's called 5th street cafe. i was working with a very creative design team, which was wonderful. it's nice to be around other creative thinkers, and it was a blast to draw on chalkboards all day (which is what i'm doing again today!).
A treasure hunter's dream.
Frank's operation is going great and he calls his brother Huey (Chiwetel Ejiofor) in NC. Huey calls his Mother (Ruby Dee) over and they're clearly excited to hear from him. Frank has his entire extended family, including his five brothers drive up to NY and shows his Mother a huge house he bought for her. They all sit down for dinner together. Frank's mother is overjoyed at the house.
Here I am again writing to you making, yet again, another case to you on why the women in the Kingdom need to drive. But before I do that, I want to tell you what I love about Saudi Arabia.
and watch people diving into it with him.
Famous-Barr's French Onion Soup
4 were in the Mystery Chix mixer goody bag
In the beginning God created the heavens and the earth. Now the earth was formless and empty, darkness was over the surface of the deep, and the Spirit of God was hovering over the waters.(Gen 1:1-2, NIV)
Bernd and Hilla Becher (2 gelatin silver prints, 1970, 1982)
All these facts were presented to to DIAC office in the Brisbane City office, where we were told that the Team Leader “Shaun” would be handling the case. We lodged the paperwork for the visa waiver condition on October 7th.
It is not love when your thoughts are unkind.
Cost: $
Since some exchanges at the Cafe a few days ago, I’ve been pondering exactly what the relevant subcategories are of this rather amorphous mass, because I think that we’ll make some serious mistakes if we try to treat “them” as uniform. I’ve come up with a few, but I’m sure there are quite a number to be identified. Here are some that I can think of personally (and these are cartoony caricatures, not nuanced psychologically informed portraits):
Another peek for ya, Anne! haha
I have read nothing by conservative philosopher Leo Strauss. I have however read accounts of his thought by various sorts of Straussians and anti-Straussians as a way of deciding if it seemed worthwhile to sit down and read the great man himself. He is said to be a difficult and ambiguous study so preliminary enquiry seemed needed. Two of the many accounts I read are here and here. Strauss disciples did seem to be rather prominent in the Bush administration and that did of course get the Left frothing at the mouth and trotting out their usual conspiracy theories. And for once there is a small germ of truth in what they say. Strauss was what would usually be called a "Gnostic" -- a purveyor of "hidden" knowledge or knowledge known only to initiates. Gnostics were very influential and widely followed in the ancient world both before and after the time of Christ. The best known Gnostic sects of the modern world are probably the Rosicrucians, the Scientologists and whatever is left of the old Freemasons.
Then, it killed brain cells. People still believe this, but it’s not actually true. (Alcohol does, most other drugs do not.)
To recap, then. It's mid-October 2010. I'm just over a year into my PhD and starting to realise that it's pointless and tedious (that's another blog post, one so unbearably wangsty I'll probably spare you altogether). It's two months since I almost quit my band. My webcomic is sliding slowly back towards hiatus. My personal life is a mess (although, arguably, no worse than normal). I've just gone back to work - I work term-time only for universities - and am busy as all hell.
is a synthesizer documentary series that first aired by Channel 4 in the UK during 2001.
1) You’ve been a good friend to people with disabilities for a long time, in a bunch of different ways. What are you currently doing that has to do with them?
I feel terribly sorry to say that our band does have a story, a story so grand and wonderful that we might even actually win a Nobel prize for literature before winning a Grammy. And you're going to listen to it, either you like it or not!
“That's the spirit boy. I need you to be a bit patient though. I need to go back home before we can leave.” Geoff looked a little sad at that.
The goal of this exercise is to clear the muck in your subconsciousness. It’s also a tool for recovery. It allows you to freely create.
Have you ever had your head turned by the wonderful incongruous sight of a Gypsy wagon parked up on a roundabout as you drove by, a horse grazing on verge grass, and a man lighting a fire in the middle of this green island-in-the-tarmac as the unceasing slick of traffic roars on? That's the feeling I'm talking about - the leap in your chest, the feeling of being eye-witness to a still-possible dream, the joy of knowing it.
Here and there over the years I would hear Coldplay-related news, like the whole Chris Martin/Gwyneth Paltrow thing, and just couldn't really make myself care. Chris Martin just seemed like such a pompous fuck, which incidentally is also how I feel about Bono, if anyone's keeping score. And so, when I saw the 420 episode of Family Guy, when Peter's too baked to set up a cutaway and just lists a bunch of celebrities he doesn't like, I laughed really hard. Chris Martin, Chris Martin again, Chris Martin's parents...and then at the end, Chris Martin's ancestors. Hilarious. See below (this was the best quality of this clip I could find).
The Moron :
The Fable of Zelda: Majora's Mask
“You’re not going to kill me? I thought you’d be really mad at me and not forgive me.” A large pout appeared on Addison’s lips, her eyes glistening with forming tears. She was ready to lay it on thick because she knew she was in big trouble with Zak and she was afraid he would kill her if she didn’t try to remedy things with him. “I thought you would-“
But if someone came along wanting to eliminate forever this branch of film, all they'd have to do is present The Ice Pirates as "Exhibit A" and the rest of their argument would write itself.
Last week I was in attendance for a planning and logistics meeting for Occupy Norfolk. Their de facto leader James McPherson has been doing a great job organizing protesters and spreading the message.
What else do we do at our house during a party?
I penetrated the massive new Bonnier stand to see Helen Boyle, Commissioning Editor for Templar. It was quite a contrast to their last year's stand. They even had their own coasters! And a sofa to wait on. "Actually there's a kitchen behind that door," Helen told me.
And what does this all mean?
Combine powdered sugar and juice in a small bowl; stir with a whisk. Brush powdered sugar mixture evenly over hot cookies. Sprinkle evenly with 2 teaspoons rind. Remove cookies from pan; cool on wire racks.
Yep, I have a whole birthday month (c:
If you were a fan of the group back in their prime (the first two Muggs produced albums) when the group still had all three members intact and Son Doobie wasn't doing porn than you know there's quite a few remixes floating around from that time period...Today we got em' all in one place.
Speculation requires me to consider the disassembly of faith I’ll let him out and, on the other hand, reassembly of his puppyhood condition of my having to clean the floor.
And yes, I will keep those ticket stubs as a memento of a memorable Birthday occasion
West Point Holiday Special ... FOX NEWS ... 1 PM *NEW
With ITV dying on its arse as we all click series record on our Freeview recorder boxes and skip through the adverts it’s no surprise that commercial TV needs to find in-programme advertising revenue, but why exclude booze?
On May 4th I will be heading up to Raleigh to go to my first appointment to start T.
Kane: (frustrated) Are you even listening to yourself right now? All I hear is blah blah blah... desperate for validation... blah blah blah.
What is your biggest goal for 2011?
Now, I haven't had an Avon Lady for years.
The greatest lesson I have learned is that I LOVE being a Vegan. When I started my blog a year ago, I wrote that I loved being a Vegan then. If it’s possible, I love it even more today. I feel so much pride in being a Vegan. Almost a year ago, I wrote, “So many people I know are afraid to tell their families and friends they are Vegan (or vegetarian) for fear of being rejected or laughed at or criticized. They hide their Veganism, which, to me, is sad and makes no sense. Why should anyone hide their compassion while the majority of the world engages in cruelty right out in the open? I am proud of being Vegan. I wear t-shirts and buttons that proclaim my Veganism. My office has posters, signs, and pamphlets about choosing compassion. While I do not try to impose my beliefs on others, I silently pray someone will ask me why I am not eating meat so I can proudly state, “I AM A VEGAN.” They might reply with “you’re a what?” and that just gives me an opportunity to teach someone the “V” word that I learned not even two years ago.” (The "V" Word, August 20, 2009)
Produced by Truth in Science, the contributors are:
My husband, David (who is a pastor) and I have been watching ABC’s documentary on the tape recordings of First Lady Jaqueline Kennedy, wife of John F. Kennedy, the thirty-fifth President of the United States. On those forty+ year-old recordings she spoke of the terrible loneliness her husband experienced as he tackled the affairs of State, his sleepless nights, his doubts and fears over decisions he had made, and the tears he shed over the failure and loss of life resulting from such decisions gone bad, such as at the Bay of Pigs.
Wayne Tucker and Tom Larsen, accompanied by dance improvisation
In February 1848 the government of King Louis-Philippe I collapsed and a liberal provisional government declared the Second Republic. Two months later, the anti-slavery campaigner Victor Schoeler and president of the commission for the abolition of slavery oversaw the passage of the decree to end slavery in French territories for the second time. The first article read:
until the warmth of dawn
A few things to do here in the St Pete area for Valentine’s Day:
The ECL guarantees that every form of energy that we give will never vanish. Nature guarantees that the value of energy that we yield equals to the value of energy we give.
John 6:53 Truly, truly, I say to you, unless you eat the flesh of the Son of Man and drink His blood, you have no life in yourselves.
Also, I'm working a story that has cows in it, so Gordon Van Gelder sent me this video. You should watch it.
Don’t blame Bay Street for overcharging you. The market charges what the market will bear. Don’t even blame corporations for getting rid of their defined benefit pension plans. Offering a DB plan means taking on risk and volatility, which will from time to time negatively shock the company’s earnings statement and balance sheet. Transferring those risks back to employees may be bad for society, but a CEO’s job is to do right by shareholders. He or she isn’t responsible for the well-being of society. Our elected
“We’ve got a lot of laps to get through here. We’ll be trying to sort out a lot of the items we’ve been testing at previous events and things we possibly want to use in the future. The really important thing from here will be the analysis after this test to see what happens to the car.”
We really had some gorgeous entries into our challenge this month. Thanks so much to everyone that joined in!
She says it was 60 cents.
Neelie Kroes, the European Commissioner for the Digital Agenda has said that the Anti Counterfeiting Trade Agreement (ACTA) , signed by almost all EU member states – but not all – is likely to follow the US’s SOPA (Stop Online Piracy Act) into the dustbin of failed legislation saying “We have recently seen how many thousands of people are willing to protest against rules which they see as constraining the openness and innovation of the internet” adding “there is a strong new political voice, and as a voice for openness, I welcome it even if I do not always agree with everything it says on every subject … we are now likely to be in a world without SOPA and ACTA”. ACTA is currently awaiting review by the Court of Justice and EU Trade Commissioner Karel de Gucht had urged the EU Parliament to delay any formal ratification of ACTA until that happened, but it now looks like the whole process has stalled as member states (even those who had previously signed up) lose the political will
In a coda to this little drama, the ULB Alumni and Students’ associations condemned the Burqa bla-bla thing, expressing their “shame at the fascist methods in a house of Free Inquiry.” They and Prof. Haarscher invited Caroline Fourest to come back, and promised better protection. But Fourest said that she’d not come back, as she had been to conferences all over the world, and nothing of this sort had happened to her except in Belgium.
The Summer Solstice is on June 20, 2012 at 4:09 PM PDT
4) Add the egg tofu and let it boil.
As the night progressed, another police car was set alight. The attention of the crowd turned to looting, and as I drove away, I saw scores of people walking in and out of JD Sports, piles of clothes in their hand. Did I sympathise with the people who saw their homes or corner shops damaged, yes. Did I sympathise with JD Sports, no.
Most MPs are members of a Committee. General Committees are set up to look at particular topics and proposed laws in more detail and then report back to everyone else with a recommendation of what should be done. They debate the topic and can call in experts to tell them more about it if they want.
Crepes
Mattison DR, Thomford PJ. Mechanisms of action of reproductive toxicants. Toxicology of Male and Female Reproductive Systems. PK Working. New York, Hemisphere.
People were not meant to die. People say that death is natural. It is not. It has never been. It will never be. The death of a plant is natural. The death of an animal maybe… but the death of a human being has no hint of natures doing. Death is the doing of a curse. We all live beneath the curses reign…
Could it be she actually helps you find an agent?
And that is precisely what black is, a literal theory or vision—all-at-once corporeal, phantasmatic, and intellectual—where this impossibility is impossible, not only in the weak blind sense that seeing black is a substitution of subjective for objective (a sense that would confine black to a relative perceptuality), but in the stronger dazzling sense that seeing black is itself the pure objectivity of vision into which consciousness is cosmically inserted: “Noir n'est pas seulement ce que l'homme voit dans l'homme, il est la seule « couleur » inséparable de l'étendue hyperintelligible de l'Univers”
Perched high upon a Harley stern-
I have a HUGE aversion to rude people.
BTW: Here are a couple of other podcasts I've been enjoying while I perform my new job this summer (available for free on iTunes):
My hamstrings are ANGRY!
I have a new appreciation for those crying, blubbering idiots on The Bachelor. You know the ones. The girls that cry so hard, they are snubbing in the limo. The ones that hyperventilate. The ones that forgo their limo ride home & exit in the back of the ambulance. THOSE girls. I could be one of them.
but then
Okay i feel TERRIBLE now, because there have been two days out of this challenge i haven't made one of these:
Anyhow. If you haven’t been to this blog before, do say hi (either here or on FB or somewhere). Otherwise I’ll have to think that none of my friends were interested enough to click the link. You wouldn’t want that, now would you?
I think the heart charm is from Dawn. I've been hoarding it for the longest time & think it suits this card perfectly - thank you Dawn.
We had our 2nd Saturday Altered Book Club meeting at Jean's lovely Victorian Home that was built in the 1800's. Here is Jean about to open her gift. The gifts were hand made for the person whose name we drew.
Finally, I went to SFWA GriefCom. You may not have heard much about this committee; when GriefCom mediates a dispute, the parties involved maintain a strict nondisclosure; no one's dirty laundry is aired. And because they see a high level of success, that means you see very little dirty laundry and very little about GriefCom.
Wine pairing: Fat Monk 2009 Pinot Noir, Central Coast, CA
Watchmen wasn't the first graphic novel, but it did an immense amount to establish the graphic novel as an important literary form, deserving of the utmost respect. Before Watchmen shows just how far is left to go.
"This decision is remarkable. The Supreme Court could have limited itself to ruling that, in the case before it, the Federal Patent Court should have considered the EPO decision. Instead, the Supreme Court established as a rule that courts must consider EPO decisions. Furthermore, the court also held that the same would apply to decisions issued by the courts of other European Patent Convention member states.
By now I was like a freak. I vomited anything I ate, I kept pissing myself and I was sat bouncing on a pink ball sucking on the gas. I looked like shit, I was tired and hungry and just wanted to sleep!
Cheers to a closer look at suppression and hypersensitivity and a knowledge level that blossoms!
The festival is dedicated to showcasing the brewers of Lancashire. As there aren't actually that many Lancashire brewers the numbers are being swelled by the breweries in the bit of Lancashire which was chopped off in 1974 and bundled into Cumbria (my homelands).
So many fantastic milongas to choose from in Buenos Aires. If you are planning a trip and need a place to stay, check out: Buenos Aires Tango House Video.
He duly did and they weren’t cheap but the container of coir from India had come through from the port in Beira a lot quicker than I’d expected so I had no chance to shop around. I agreed and waited for the container to arrive which it did around 9 a.m. on Friday. By 10 a.m. there was still no sign of the forklift so I got back to Herbert who was as puzzled as I was. A bit of phoning around and we managed to contact the forklift driver but then lost the signal. I started to wonder if they were lost, it doesn’t take THAT long to get out from the industrial sites. By 11 I was distinctly annoyed and wondering if there was an alternative way to offload the container. I got another phone number off Herbert and managed to contact the driver’s assistant. They were some 2km down the road so would be here shortly. It was a noisy phone call with what sounded like a very noisy gearbox in the background. It really didn’t sound good. 10 minutes later they were still not in sight. I wondered about the gearbox sound and then the penny dropped; they were driving the forklift on the road – I’ve heard them and they make that sort of sound. I couldn’t believe it but shortly a small blue forklift appeared on the road to the nursery. They really had driven across town in a forklift!
422210 Drugs & druggists’ sundries
The last card of the haul is this Chipper Jones 2002 Fleer Focus Jersey Edition Materialistic insert. The center of the card is some sort of cloth. I can't say I've ever seen this card before and the seller was only asking a buck or two. I wasn't able to use any Photons for this transaction, but it still was a good deal.
9. Boy Lilikoi
I met him at the first time when I was high school student, my mom's friend knew him and he has been taking English private lesson from him, then he introduced him to me, and I had started taking his English lessons too. He gave the lessons at the nice restaurant where served really nice Mexican food and some drinks as well,(of cause I couldn't drink when I went to there.(T_T)) I learned English basically from him, and they (another women who took care of the restaurant and helped me a lot either.) also helped me a lot to go to the USA for studying after I finished high school. They were the part of changing my life...However the time has past,,,We don't contact each other anymore, I've been looking for them, but I couldn't find...they also have closed the restaurant already, I had no ideas where they were at all. And then 10 years later...just a month ago, the teacher found me on the Facebook, and he talked to me! I was sooooooooooooo surprised and I was like,,,,oh my god, I just can't believe I'm talking with you now again!!!! He said that they came back to this town a couple years ago, and started the English lessons again here.
Out there,
- The Franklin Park Reading Series returns in less than two weeks, thanks to the tireless efforts of local literary hostess extraordinaire Penina Roth. I'll run a more detailed preview next week, but in the meantime, mark your calendar for Monday, September 14th at 8:00 PM, and check out the lineup here.
Jerks.
If you learn or benefit from these works, please consider adopting a Vedic student on a monthly or yearly basis to help keep the Sanskrit and Vedic traditions alive. For more information, please click here. “
Perhaps my favorite element about this flick was that as much as it may talk about the war on drugs and how we are sometimes winning and losing it, Soderbergh kind of leaves it up to us to make our own assumptions about how we feel about drugs. I thought this was a very brave and smart thing to do considering everybody is effected by drugs differently and it’s up to us to decide what is right and what is wrong when it comes to drugs, we can’t just depend on the government to save us. The flick never gets preachy and as much as Soderbergh may be showing this flick off like an anti-drug film, it still also shows the fact that drugs are really starting to take over the world, and very quickly I might add. Soderbergh does a great job by not saying anything when he could have easily made this a 2 hour and 30 minute long sermon about how he felt about drugs. Instead, he didn’t which is definitely what won me over for this flick.
Anyhow, we talked with Eddie's manager for a while, and dude, if it was not like falling directly into the movie "Spinal Tap" and talking to Artie Fufkin, (except with David St. Hubbin's accent) I don't know what. Seriously, that guy went to 11. Full stop. He was talkin' 90 to nothin', giving Julia a full accounting of his fiscal activities and side ventures, obviously feathering the nest so that the Texas hottie would fall right into his arms. I felt like Julia's doting auntie, there to protect her from the depredations of British husksters and the like. My favorite part was how he talked about being so unimpressed with celebrities, but dropping names right and left like he had to name every famous person he's ever met, because let's face it, the more famous names you drop, the hornier we women get!
It was a few days later, having gone up to Edinburgh and the Yorkshire Dales and back, that we arrived in Hurst Green. It was late in the evening, so we settled at the inn, and had a drink or two before bed:
Swimming in a fresh clear lake
But once she starts slapping her babies and making them cry, I want to kick her in the head. I’m sorry, but I do. I’ve watched so many moms haul off and whack a baby’s back so hard you can feel the hollow thud in your teeth. A flag should drop. A penalty box. Disqualification. Intervention. Something. But, like everything else to do with women and babies in crisis, there is nothing. Only silence. Only people like me, the bastion of balls and bravery, quietly wheeling my cart the other way.
(*) Note to readers who have an RSS feed on this blog, for whatever unaccountable reason: something I did when putting that asterisk in was obviously a macro for "publish", because that's what happened. Hope you liked the original spelling, comes to to you courtesy of Seagrams and Schweppes.
The galley will be open all day, serving great food.
Participants are invited to submit works three categories: critical writing, visual communication practice and the participatory art/communication category Beyond…
I am not afraid of everything.
Garam masala 1 tsp
Wilson continued the long line of excellent Arsenal goalkeepers and was a pivotal player in the success of the 1968 – 73 period. The parallels with today and the struggle to replace Seaman are uncanny. For Barnett, Rimmer and Wood read Almunia, Shabaan, Manninger.
Discover the Secret to Finding a Cheap iPod Mini!
The Prospectus is essentially a twenty-page document in which you describe what your dissertation will look like, written before you write your dissertation. In this process, you perform a "meta" analysis, as one of my professor's likes to say, which means you think about the process of the dissertation, rather than the dissertation itself. It's putting the Philosophy into my Doctorate of Philosophy.
the novel in 1928 as a stereotyped edition. I have made minimal changes to the text, standardising, where necessary, irregularities in spelling and punctuation. I have added an introduction and explanatory notes, which explore Devanny’s beliefs and background and the novel’s historical contexts.
If you are new to Spiritual Sundays and would like to share a post on your blog, please click on Linking Info under the header picture for information. Everyone is invited.
The area for horizontal menubar buttons is as wide as your header, in normal Minima template for 2 column it is 648px. And 3 column, which I've used it is 868px. So now it depends on, how many buttons you want to add, what size they should be.
Ten officers checked six bars and 58 residences with 51 contacts being made with offenders or other household members.
Mead, in putting together his social psychology drew heavily upon the converging
Every now and then, I try to step out of my comfort zone and create something that I struggle with- distressing. The vintage look is another thing. The background was from MDS that I distressed to tone down the color. I also did some distressing on the ribbon. I added the flower (using the 5 petal flower punch) which I distressed and sprayed a touch of glitter. Hope you like it.
Love makes everything serene.
To give credit to Mr Clegg, he always said he would have no hesitation in removing the whip from the peer if he felt she had overstepped the mark. He has been as good as his word.
when you turn your gaze
San Antonio Marketing and Design pretty much had a great day, today. We had our first client meeting, under our new name! We’re looking forward to helping this new client.
Glowgold finally appeared, a bit grumpy and nervous, for the irritating Siamese cat delighted in chasing fairies. Purry Paw loved to bat at their delicate wings. Glowgold’s escort pounced on top of the cedar chest and intentionally draped his wide, gray tail over the keyhole.
Oh, controversial.
I don’t know how much more patience I have in me. I’m very behind on bills and I’ve needed a job ASAP for 3 months.
Solemn's blue eyes pierced through Ben like the knives they used in other towns.
Level 8: MP Cost: 55, Damage: 214%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 6 times, 18% chance to stun the enemy for 4 seconds.
I then became interested in Jess who appears as minor character in both books. So in STUFFED, the third book in the cycle, Jess becomes a main character together with her boyfriend Ryan. Each has an awful secret to keep from the other. Will their love survive the roller coaster ahead? STUFFED will be published in October 2012.
Humans can say words at each other without communicating, too.
intuitive to draw Blot on paper in black ink. He then gets scanned and cleaned
I’ll not be hammering too much on the psyops-connection in this case as I do realize that it may be somewhat mind-boggling for most readers, and even for those who dared to ignore the warning message at the beginning of this article. However, while we’re on the subject I would like to refer sceptics to a very recent article published on politicsweb called, “How to ruin a newspaper group”. The article is about Gavin O'Reilly stepping down as chief executive of Independent News & Media (INM), and mentions how INM was handpicked by Nelson Mandela, in 1994, to purchase the Argus Group of newspapers… So, please – don’t even try convincing me that the Naspers assembly of chiefs haven’t also been handpicked by the current communist rulers of this country!
It is also important to identify all the different ways of putting the invention into practice. Given the complexity of biological systems this is not always straightforward. For example if the invention concerns a diagnostic test in which the presence of a specific polymorphism is detected, then one should consider whether there are other polymorphisms linked to the specific polymorphism that could also form the basis of the diagnostic test.
Whose voice would it be if you heard the likes of, “I am Jesus of Nazareth?” It would obviously be an impostor. He wouldn’t be speaking for He finished speaking in the final revelation of His Word, the Bible. Certainly, he would be adding to His already completed revelation and we know from Revelation 22:18 the penalty for adding to that Word.
So if local councils have to cut back, things like shelters for victims of domestic abuse, public libraries and public loos shouldn't be affected. They should cut their marketing budget, their publication of useless leaflets about recycling budget and maybe their bonus pool. (Recycling isn't useless, but junk mail about it is.)
First, we should make sure we're using the same definition of "treason," and then, let's look at some recent examples of anti-secular behaviors and consider whether they constitute an attempt to replace the U.S. government with a theocracy. We might also want to consider what steps short of "replacing the government" might also constitute treason, as I suspect we can easily imagine a this is not something that could be accomplished in one fell swoop, but would require a host of undermining actions, some of which we might think less harmful/unconstitutional/illegal than others.
When ready to cook, place the marinated pork and water in a pressure cooker and cook till the pork is tender, still holding its shape, about 15 minutes.
chives, finely sliced
This was my project class in July. It uses the Nature Walk stamp set from the Mini catalogue (page 24).
For the Past 23 years I have the spent Christmas in Florida with my parents and my Granny. With the exception of two years when we spent Easter there instead and the first year I was married I went down the week after christmas.
and delicious pizza that stuck to the pan a little and had to be eaten with a fork. this picture was pre-ranch. the best babysitter ever taught my sisters and I to put ranch on pizza and we never looked back
The ads have a bold look as well, with “It’s time for Skype,” featured below the slogan:
-Moments from Working at the Movie Theatre That Have Surprised Me
The next 146 pages provide very detailed Canon camera and Speedlite specific information. However, if you use other equipment, you can still benefit from this section. The presentation is such that a general need or application is described and a general solution is proposed. This is good basic information for any photographer. The presentation then shows how to execute the proposed solution with Canon equipment. If you use other equipment, skip this part. If you use Canon equipment, you will find yourself making bookmarks as the book rather quickly becomes an often used reference manual.
What the teacher pay issue should point out is the HUGE DROP in private sector wage growth to the point where the teachers have passed it up.
“Jeez you sound so smart!” she remarked. “I’ve got the lead part in a movie called Basic Instinct and shooting starts next week. Got any acting tips you’d like to pass on?”
StargazingFor the newbie to dreaming or even the planet , are a good pair of binocularses a large measure from scanning the sky with the naked eye.
We'd love to see your take on this project and join in on the fun! You can find the details how below along with the DT's projects to give you some inspiration!
If you place prepositions incorrectly, it will just make the writing look amateurish. In other words, don’t start a sentence with a preposition for the sake of it, and certainly don’t overload the narrative with them. Think about how effective they might be first. For example:
3 Crossman Richard1975. Diaries of a Cabinet Minister. Vol.1
The Viking: We're having a little daughter in a few months. We're so excited and glad! She'll have Down syndrome, but in today's world that's just a little bump in the road. We're so happy!
I forgot how much I hate the treadmill.
About 10 days ago the weather was on the warmer side so I decided to tackle the project. The curvy lines and details were what attracted me to begin with…….
There are several problems here. The first and most obvious is the quid pro quo for positive editorial coverage. This is the Wall Street Journal, for god’s sake, giving away biased editorial coverage openly in exchange for favors. The second is the circulation audit bureau legitimizing the scheme by declaring that copies at a penny a piece handed out freely as swag at seminars counts as paid circulation. Even that, as obviously crooked as it is, wouldn’t be so bad if it was a modest number of copies. But it accounted for over 40% of their daily circulation for over a year, or somewhere in the neighborhood of 30,000 copies per day! That’s a helluva lot of seminars, don’t you think. The first question that popped into my head was, “were all these copies actually printed?” Given the sheer numbers involved here, I wouldn’t be surprised if most of them never existed in the first place.
I am in the throes of my next technical challenge=creating fabric by applying ribbon. I have been thinking about this project for years and while I am happy to be upon it just now, I must vent (a little).
By the Easter weekend of 2004 Ísafjörður was hosting the first Aldrei fór ég suður festival, which translates as "Never went south". Ever since then, the festival has attracted some of Iceland's best-known musicians to play free gigs at a warehouse in the town's harbour.
Q4: Why the reason for the incarceration?
...These “famine marriages” – as they are called – not only lead to girls dropping out of school, but also make them vulnerable to sexually transmitted infections...
With seed accelerators proliferating all over the world, one wonders if the talent pool at each individual accelerator will become severely diluted. Though it is impossible to gain data about the success of companies grown from seed accelerators that have not yet had the opportunity to flourish or flop, one can surmise that more startup accelerators will mean fewer success stories from each specific program. When YCombinator had less competition, it meant that they got their pick of the litter. Nowadays, founders may not want to schlep to Silicon Valley if they are confident that they can still make it in their home cities or countries.
We also tried to fish in that swimming whole. There were a couple of small fishes there, probably grayling. They were biting really well. The problem was that I have brought way to large hooks. That was fine exercise, we weren’t going to mess with cooking them anyway.
"You are kidding, right?"
That the Eagle became such a resonant and lasting voice in Brooklyn would have come as a surprise to its founders, who intended the paper to be a temporary endeavor, as a voice for the Democratic Party in Brooklyn through the election season following the death of President William Henry Harrison. But one of the founders, a printer named Isaac Van Anden, saw the paper’s value and took it over as the sole proprietor after the election.
I want her out of there NOW!!!
The new devotional materials for the kids got here today. So excited! Can’t wait to try it out tomorrow. Funny thing is, my friend who I have been talking about God with is asking me all the same questions in the textbook.
Also, because my mother and my father have one sister each, we are a close extended family, and I'd visit each of them and their families growing up.
B.A. (Honours) Mathematics
Me and the motorcycle
Everybody has to start somewhere and gaming can be one of the tougher pastimes to get started with.
i wish you hadnt gone down.
Their journey will take them across the lawless plains, to a frontier town gripped by gold fever, through feuds, duels, and massacres, high into unmapped mountains to a reckoning with ancient enemies, and force them into alliance with Nicomo Cosca, infamous soldier of fortune, a man no one should ever have to trust . . . . Publication has been confirmed for November stateside and October in the UK. As much as I want to enjoy Spring and Summer, Fall can't get her quick enough.
Caller: Who is this?
Jack finally catches up and we begin to walk through the opening in the wooden fence, and I place my hand on his shoulder. I can feel him shivering as we cross the schoolyard. I tell him, "We need to stop at the nurse's office so you can change your clothes, you're soaked." Jack starts to object, "But I don't..." Interrupting, I say, "Remember, this is why she has the clothes in her office, so if you need to, you can change." We enter the building and head down the long hallway. When we come to the open door of Nurse Linda's office, the first door down on the right, I knock as we walk in.
Nevertheless, I had to go to YouTube rehab school. Seriously, I could not get to my channel until I watched a video and then took a test. I failed the test 4 times. Evidently the "write in" answer, "Go fuck yourself" was not what they were looking for!
Uggh!! Why oh why is my body so jacked up? I think somewhere deep inside, I thought that if I had a "normal" pregnancy that somehow my body would just snap into where it should be. HA! Not this ole body.
Because I've been trying to keep busy sightseeing, meeting up with friends and all that, I wasn't able to find much time to give last week's artistic consumption log my usual annotations. So once again, here's a barebones accounting of what I consumed artistically this week. As you can imagine, it's a rather, um, lean list...but a good one, for the most part.
Understand, I can well imagine how terribly annoying it is to be deluged with advice on a regular basis about everything you do. But if people truly want to give me something, I would rather receive their wisdom and their true opinion of me than more things.
try it, you'll like it (any yo gabba gabba fans out there?)
We are asked simply to dwell on people in an institution, people who are arranged and coded by an institution. This is confirmed by the layout of the exhibition, recalling Jeremy Bentham’s Panoptican and the rhetoric of Michel Foucault’s Discipline and Punish. The Panoptican was the prototype for societal control and became a symbol for the inescapable fact that humans are bound and subjected to power. Tan, in using this allusion along with intentionally supplanting narrative, places her work in a postmodern context which places humans in a discourse of power relations.
1 consulting
Read these stories and then PLEASE come to South Africa for a WELL DESERVED extra-long holiday so that you may personally experience first-hand the harsh realities of the BLACK RUTHLESS SOUTH AFRICA that YOU created!
At least 5 large cloves of fresh garlic, roughly chopped
** I also have a new camera strap slipcover colorway and several new mug rugs & coffee coat/mug rug sets that I will be listing but ran out of time. **
living with for years, challenging aspects of my absolute identity. I
But today, after 5 years, decided that these notes don’t anything for me anymore. Sure, they hold sentimental value, but the depth of the relationship would be reflected in what I have TODAY and that looks very different from what the notes say.
“Goggles, gloves, flame retardant aprons and safety shoes. Make them sign out each screwdriver too, so you can make sure they all get returned.”
I do think it is important to keep visiting places such as this whenever we have the chance. It is all too easy to dismiss them as something for the tourists and forget about what we do have at home (well, not exactly at home for someone living in Felixstowe, but you know what I mean). Not sure where our next target for a trip will be. Since listening to the History of the World in 100 Objects series I do want to go back to the British Museum and see them in the flesh so to speak, but there are so many other places we haven't seen at all.
Biotherm White D-Tox Corrective Make Up Base
During the month of April you have the opportunity to order from the adorable "Summer Smooches" Suite of products. They are bright, cheery and just plain cute! Last night I had my "Gimme A Smooch" Stamp Camp and we made four projects using various things from the suite and the ladies loved them. :-) One of the projects we made using the new Petite Purse Die for the Big Shot. It's so simple and easy to use. Here's what we made with it.....
Completely
But thanks to the sales, I was able to get out & spend some cash without the inevitable, "just spent 35€ on a sweater" remorse -- and it was magical. Walking home, I felt like I was tramping down a rainbow paved street on the back of a pristine unicorn eating calorie-less cake. Triumph is the only word I can think to describe my mood properly.
4-6 strips of bacon (depending on thickness)
What I like straight away about Grosvenor House Publishing and the way they present their services is the balance they have struck with selling author services without overly engaging in the ‘publishing dreams’ hard-sell. It seems that author solution companies consistently fail to get the balance right on their websites and publishing guides when they advertise their services. Far too often in my reviews I encounter companies who decorate their services with unrealisable dreams and promises of success to the author and a general and concerted attempt to make the process of publishing seem austere and complex. There is also the other extreme, where a company will disclose as little as possible about their services, costs and contract details in an effort to present their publishing model as that of a traditional royalty-paying publisher.
Happy crafting everyone.
Gary
As we know, there’s nothing magic about using language really well and children can learn to do so: that’s why many of us run writing workshops. I think it’s essential that those teachers involved with creative writing classes should also write themselves from time to time.
“I don’t know why I’m here,” Lucy said. This time her voice betrayed a hint of fear.
Not really my cup of tea.
So so so Beast
Photograph everything- posters, projects, organizational methods, the room. These are from my own student teaching experience:) Ask for copies, most teachers are happy to share. I still use the lesson plan template shared with me during student teaching.
My success and lead in the league was built upon the foundations of a brilliant August and September where at one point I had a 100+ point lead, but since then I’ve been fairly good at best. My colleagues were slowly chipping away, desperate to overthrow the Manchester United of their league and replace it with Anyone-But-Matt.
go over my desk. After searching for a few weeks with no luck, I decided to make my own!
Sorry, Mike! I don’t know what came over me, but at this point, this story does more to entertain my life than you do, because I don’t know you anymore! So I guess it was the right thing to do in the long run, in a very calculating way. But in an empathetic way, I do feel kinda bad about convincing you that you were going to die. And thus, this confessional. Which is also kind of a “look how fucked up I am” brag, in a way. I am both ashamed of and thankful for this story.
Wash your extensions properly if you wear them often. If you are an everyday extension wearer, please wash your extensions! Grease from your natural hair (and the dirt from the day, of course!) can travel down to your extensions and make them a lot dirtier than you think. I use just regular shampoo and conditioner on mine but you can ask a hair specialist what would be the best type of shampoo for extensions. As for the actual washing, I recommend washing them in cool water so they won't damage or wash the dye out.
I can never get enough of lilacs when they are in season...I just love them so much! But, sadly, they do not last long. I do have a Miss Kim lilac bush that always blooms later than the traditional lilac bushes, so at least I will get a whole new bunch of fragrant blooms again here in a few weeks!!
My personal opinion on Breitbart is as follows: I disliked much of his work. I thought his temperament was foul and obnoxious (I'm not speaking of his conservative ideology, but of how he disparaged and held in contempt those who disagreed with him), and some of his journalistic practices sleazy and unethical. I do not know him personally, though many who do have praised him as a nice guy in person (a remark commonly uttered about our political provocateurs). I'm certainly not happy to hear he's dead--he's only two years older than I am, and it's rather clear from the circumstances that neither he nor his family were prepared and ready for him to die. Nor am I about to join in the sort of not-glad-hes-dead-but-glad-he's-gone bile that is frequently offered up when a controversial figure dies. I was somewhat pleased to hear of the demise last year of Osama Bin Laden--not joyous, certainly, but at least relieved; and I did not mourn the passing earlier this year of Kim Jong-Il. But both of these men were monsters; Breitbart (and other players in US politics and media), whatever his faults, is not in their company.
Therefore put to death your members which are on the earth: fornication, uncleanness, passion, evil desire, and covetousness, which is idolatry (my italics). (Colossians 3:5)
any online shops?
Fruit...
‘The Yellowstone volcano’s previous behavior is the best guide of what it will do in the future,’ says Ben Ellis, co-author and post-doctoral researcher at Washington State University’s School of the Environment.
“It’s not a problem” he replied, unfazed.
Long waited desires, today were met.
1 stick butter, room temp
Think of a random number. Can I predict what you randomly thought of? Mathematicians will say yes. They will say that everything can be explained in math, if one just uses the correct variables and methods. They will insist that mathematics is the language of the universe, the very syntax and underlying structure of creation.
First, I had to decide on a filling. My first idea was to use a filling similar to what's used in potstickers then I decided against it because I thought it lacked universal appeal. I then narrowed my ideas down to two options: 1) A filling made with beef, taco seasoning, and cheese, or 2) a filling made with Italian sausage, Italian seasonings, a little pizza sauce, and mozzarella and parmesan cheeses. They both sounded good (at least, to me). These, of course, would be dipped in egg and bread crumbs and deep-fried. Ultimately, I flipped a coin and went with Option 1. I still think the Italian-inspired Option 2 sounds good and maybe I'll try making it for myself sometime.
So it came as a surprise when we were told she needed more invasive testing and surgery to repair the blockage was on the cards.
Tower Challenger. Serial 5CT 369487. Made for Sears, Roebuck & Co. by Smith-Corona. It's no mistake that I show this machine next; it's the Sears equivalent of the Clipper we just looked at earlier. Note the identical setup, with no tabulator, no paper support arms on the carriage and two fewer keys than the Silent-Super and Electric. Note however the very different looking profile used for the top cover; you will see this on the Tower Commander (with tabulator) and Tower President (like the Silent-Super) as well as other Tower models. It's very much like the chop front cover used on in-house branded Smith-Corona machines, but it isn't perfectly identical. If we assume that this machine's serial number is running in line with Smith-Corona's regular production, this machine is only a year or a year and a half older than the Clipper seen above. Let's move a bit later, and up the price scale a bit, at Sears for our last machine of this feature.
Not only a legendary jazz pianist, he was also a talented song writer who co-wrote Sinatra’s first hit, “Oh, Look At Me Now,” and, “Hot Time in the Town of Berlin,” a hit for both Sinatra and Bing Crosby, as well as songs for Della Reese, Louis Armstrong, Louis Jourdan, Nat King Cole, for the Andrews Sisters, and sang and played some of his own compositions in his inimitable style.
In my opinion, the Oath of Office does not permit that course of action. Under the terms of that Oath, officeholders are required to properly discharge their duties at all times. A holder of ministerial office ought not to allow family interests to come into conflict with his/her duty to protect national/public interests. It seems clear to me that the actual course of decisions by Nunez-Tesheira in this episode is contrary to both the spirit and intent of the Oath of Office.
The problem is that while Ambiga heads a civil rights movement which is winning support by the day from young people, who incidentally make up the bulk of new voters, she has chosen to tie that movement with Opposition politics.
Research indicates nearly one in three business owners are planning to exit their business in the next five years. Who will buy the businesses that are marginally profitable, require 60 or more hours a week and have recurring employee issues? The children of those owners are rarely interested in assuming the same burdens they’ve watched their parents bear, and for the same reasons, few purchasers see value in buying such a business.
6. BaubleBar Silver Stud Wrap - The multi-wrap-around design coupled with the heavier box-chain links makes this bracelet a perfect compliment to the Metro Pearl Stud earrings glittering in your ears.
I was bullied at secondary school for three years because I wasn’t like the other boys. I didn’t like football, preferred the company of girls, and was softly spoken. I was gay, and although not open about it, a group of pupils knew I was different and they bullied me because of it.
